








SK Networks - Summary








`





































Company Introduction
Business Introduction
Investment Information
Employment Information






SK networks
CEO Greeting
Corporate Culture
Ethical Management
Social Contribution
Global Network
PR Center



Trading
ICT Marketing 
Petroleum Products
Car-life Business
Walkerhill


Management Info
Stock Info
Financial Info
IR


Who we want?
Fostering System
Announcement




main_menu
                            A company preparing for the future for customers’ happiness
CEO Greeting - Philosophy of the CEO and introduction of SK networks
Press release - SK networks’latest press releases
Stock Information - Real-time stock price and analysis of charts 
Business Introduction - Various business information at a glance 
Employment Information - SK networks fostering precious talents
Complaint Department - Q / A for products and services 












CompanyIntroduction


SK networks

Summary
History
Transparent Management
Affiliates and Subsidiaries


CEO Greeting

Corporate Culture

Ethical Management

Summary of Ethical Management


Social Contribution

Introduction of Social Contribution


Global Network
PR Center

Ad Gallery

Ad Gallery


CI Manual

CI











Summary


Company Intro
SK networksSummary

One step closer to becominga world-class integrated marketing company




For the pastsixty years,
SK networks has always beenat our customers' sides.
The foundation of SK networks in 1953 signaled a
                        new start for the Korean economy which had been
                        in a slump following the devastation of the Korean
                        war.SK networks was formerly known as Sunkyung
                        Textile,whose name meant 'brilliance' and 'growth' 
                        and began operations by repairing 20 old weaving
                        machines damaged by bombing.
Since 1953, SK networks has always been at our
                        customers' sides with the same vision and spirit
                        it had when it once gave the nation hope and a
                        reason to dream during the revitalization of Korea.
SK networks has always been with you.



We are thinkingof our customersat this very moment.
We are preparing for the futurefor our customers’ happiness.


When you wake up in the morning and get dressed 
                              in the clothes you like to start a day
                              When you ride your car and go to work
                              When you talk with a friend with your smart phone
                              When you have a romantic dinner with your sweetheart in 
                              a hotel restaurant When you return home in the evening and 
                              go to bed When you feel or when you do not feel
                            Always there’s a company in your life. 
As a company that knows the most about you and is thinking 
                              seriously about what is the best for its customers, SK networks
                             is a lifestyle partner of our customers.













Location
SK networks | 90, Namdaemun-ro, Jung-Gu, Seoul 04534, Korea | TEL +82 70-7800-2114
                Copyright © 2012 by SK Networks Co. Ltd. All Rights Reserved.





FAMILYSITE

SK Group
SK Energy
SK Chemicals
SK E&S
SK gas
SK Energy
SK Telecom
SK Telink
SK Telesys
SK C&C
SK innovation
SK shipping
SK marketing
Walkerhill
SK Stock
SK Global Chemical
SK hynix
SK planet
SK lubricants
SK broadband















SK networks


















































Company Introduction
Business Introduction
Investment Information
Employment Information






SK networks
CEO Greeting
Corporate Culture
Ethical Management
Social Contribution
Global Network
PR Center


Trading
ICT Marketing 
Petroleum Products
Car-life
Walkerhill


Management
Stock Info
Financial Info
IR


Who we want?
Fostering System
Announcement




main_menu
                        A company preparing for the future for customers’ happiness
CEO Greeting - Philosophy of the CEO and introduction of SK networks
Stock Information - Real-time stock price and analysis of charts 
Business Introduction - Various business information at a glance 
Employment Information - SK networks fostering precious talents
Complaint Department - Q / A for products and services 














A Lifestyle Partner Creating a Prosperous Life







































SK networks

1A trading company
2An ICT Device Distribution Company
3A petroleum supply company
4A total automotive services company
5Owners of the best in premium services hotels




Global Network







Stock Information










SK networksGo Main
Trading
prev »
Next »

1A trading company

1A trading company
2An ICT Device Distribution Company
3A petroleum supply company
4A total automotive services company
5Owners of the best in premium services hotels



Breaking down the barriers between nations
In our Trading & Investment business, superior manpower and regional experts in each industry are conducting global trading in industrial materials such as chemicals, steel and Coal in our global outposts all over the world. Ultimately, T&I will emerge as a top-tier global trading & Investment company by completing a revolutionary business structure maximizing synergy effects.




Chemicals

Conducting business in aromatics, chemical fiber materials, solvents and fertilizers


Steel

Supply steel products produced at home and abroad to overseas markets


Coal

We are focused on developing coal mines in Australia and trading coal in Korea.












SK networksGo Main
ICT Marketing
prev »
Next »

2An ICT Device Distribution Company

1A trading company
2An ICT Device Distribution Company
3A petroleum supply company
4A total automotive services company
5Owners of the best in premium services hotels



Changing the Paradigms of ICT Device Distribution
IM BU conducts an optimized mobile and device distribution business in both the retail and wholesale sectors, delivering ICT devices such as mobile phones, laptops and tablet PCs through a broad range of online and offline channels. We also provide ICT solutions and services to our customers, and are involved in recycling and exporting mobile devices.





Mobile Phones





Distribution Service





ICT Devices














SK networksGo Main
PetroleumProducts Distribution
prev »
Next »

3A petroleum supply company

1A trading company
2An ICT Device Distribution Company
3A petroleum supply company
4A total automotive services company
5Owners of the best in premium services hotels



Filling up with happiness 
Our petroleum products distribution business selling finished petroleum products such as gasoline, kerosene and diesel to the SK gas stations and factories nationwide has maintained market dominance for over 40 years




Petroleum Products Distribution

Expanding our global presenceby seeking out new overseasmarkets for petroleum, asphaltand lubricants









SK networksGo Main
Car-lifeBusiness
prev »
Next »

4A total automotive services company

1A trading company
2An ICT Device Distribution Company
3A petroleum supply company
4A total automotive services company
5Owners of the best in premium services hotels



Happiness on the road
Our car-life business launched ‘Speedmate’, the first specialized light car maintenance shop in Korea, in 1999 and has since become the No. 1 brand in this business area. Also, we are expanding into the car rental business and emergency roadside services (ERS)




Car Rental

We will maintain profitable growth by expanding into long-term car rentals.


Auto Maintenance

We are leading the light car maintenance market through high-quality repair services


ERS

We are strengthening on-site CS activities to provide even kinder services










SK networksGo Main
Walkerhill
prev »
Next »

5Owners of the best in premium services hotels

1A trading company
2An ICT Device Distribution Company
3A petroleum supply company
4A total automotive services company
5Owners of the best in premium services hotels



ADD A STYLE TO ONE’S LIFE
As an ‘Entertainment Leader Creating Greater Value’ for guests,Walkerhill is gaining recognition in various businesses includingGrand Walkerhill Seoul, Vista Walkerhill Seoul, Incheon Airport Transit Hotel, etc.




Total
Grand Walkerhill Seoul
Vista Walkerhill Seoul
Walkerhill Customer Service Business








Grand Walkerhill Seoul












Grand Walkerhill Seoul
Nestled amid the picturesque Hangang River and Achasan Mountain, Grand Walkerhill Seoul is an urban destination providing guests soothing relaxation in nature, as well as banquets, entertainment, and leisure facilities accompanied by its five-star service. It features a variety of scenic attractions such as Cherry Blossom in spring; shades of trees in summer; foliage in autumn; snowy landscape in winter; and various facilities such as ‘Riverpark’, an outdoor swimming pool overlooking a panorama of the river; ‘Camping in the City’ offering unique camping experience; ‘Walkerhill Kids Club’ for children; ‘Walkerhill Library’ which is book café where guests can allow themselves in reading piles of books in comfort. In addition, a convention center of sizes and purposes with 8 functions room (Vista Hall, Aida, Walkerhill Theater, Cosmos Hall, Art Hall, Pine Room, and Grand Hall), which is equipped with state-of-the-art lighting & sound systems, a full-service team of professionals and in-house technicians, offers guests the best service for family gatherings, wedding, large-scale international conference, and business events.








Vista Walkerhill Seoul












Vista Walkerhill Seoul
Vista Wakerhill Seoul is an ideal place for guests who wish to experience unique culture and desire healing to escape from a bustling city life. In April 2017, Vista Walkerhill Seoul will be newly opened under a concept of ‘Wellness & Technology’ with a ‘Nature’ motif.








Walkerhill Customer Service Business











Walkerhill Customer Service Business
Walkerhill Customer Service Business operates the Incheon Airport Transit Hotel, and guests can enjoy the taste of Walkerhill at ‘Matina’, lounge restaurant in the Incheon International Airport. In addition, the guests can experience a savor of Walkerhill with elegant traditional Japanese and Chinese flavor in Faro Grand, sky lounge restaurant, which located in Eulgiro, Seoul. It also operates Terrasse, contemporary casual all day dining and Café Isetta located in the BMW Driving Center, which is the world’s first Automobile Cultural complex, and several clubhouses at golf courses in the metropolitan area, including Sky72, Incheon Grand CC, Hilldeloci, Smart Ku, Kosca CC and Shinedale CC. In 20 January 2017, we newly present Capsule Hotel in Incheon International Airport for the first time in Korea.



















Location
SK networks | 90, Namdaemun-ro, Jung-Gu, Seoul 04534, Korea | TEL +82 70-7800-2114
                Copyright © 2012 by SK Networks Co. Ltd. All Rights Reserved.





FAMILYSITE

SK Group
SK Energy
SK Chemicals
SK E&S
SK gas
SK Energy
SK Telecom
SK Telink
SK Telesys
SK C&C
SK innovation
SK shipping
SK marketing
Walkerhill
SK Stock
SK Global Chemical
SK hynix
SK planet
SK lubricants
SK broadband










SK NETWORKS CO.,LTD. South Korea Manufacturers, suppliers





















































Sign in
Join Free

About tradeKorea


Support




FAQ


Contact us


Newsletter Subscribe


TradeAlert


How to Use


Product Listing Policy






Service




News & Notice


Success Stories


KITA Member's Lounge


Online Exhibition


GBMS


Global Partners


KITA ePay Information


Keyword Trends


Korea Trade Statistics






My tradeKorea




Seller


My Inquries


My Products


My Sales


My C/L


My Report


Minisite


Buyer


My Inquries


My Buying Leads


My Order


My Accounts





Cart

국문
中文






MENU


Home
Products
Company Information
Notice Board
      Contact Us       

Send Inquiry
+82-2-9190-3540







http://c32909a.tradekorea.com
SK NETWORKS CO.,LTD.
			 
		



























SK NETWORKS CO.,LTD.
SK NETWORKS CO.,LTD.






				
					
					
					    
					    
					    Category Product
					
				
			

Category menu




Category background


Other[2]














								Speedmate MF Battery
							












								Video Pancake and Video Cassette Housing(V-0) and Audio pancake/Jumbo Web and Audio Cassette Housing(C-0), and CD Jewel Box
							












				
					
					
					    Company Profile
					    
					    
					
				
			






















Close









Company NameSK NETWORKS CO.,LTD.
Business Type
Year Established
-

LocationSouth Korea
Main MarketsChina,Indonesia,Japan,U.S.A,Viet Nam
Total Employees

												
												1001-2000 People
											

Homepage

www.sknetworks.com











Go to KITA.org




Global Business Matching Service


Post Buying Leads


My tradeKorea


How to use tradeKorea







Privacy Policy - 
						Terms of Use - 
						About tradeKorea - 
						
Korean Manufacturers
Copyright ⓒ 2008 - Thu Aug 03 23:50:26 GMT+09:00 2017  KITA (Korea International Trade Association). All rights reserved.


tradeKorea.com is a Global Business to Business (B2B) Online Marketplace that helps facilitate online trade between exporters and importers from around the world.
tradeKorea








SK Telecom - Wikipedia






















 






SK Telecom

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


SK Telecom Co., Ltd.
에스케이텔레콤주식회사





Type

Public


Traded as

NYSE: SKM


Industry
Telecommunications


Founded
April 20, 1984; 33 years ago (April 20, 1984) (as Korea Mobile Telecommunications)
1997 (as SK Telecom)


Headquarters
Jung District, Seoul, South Korea



Key people

Park Jung-ho (CEO)


Products
Wireless telecom.
Cellular internet
Internet
Mobile platform
Internet of Things


Revenue
 $17.092 billion (2016, Consolidated)[1]



Number of employees

20,955


Parent
SK Group (Since 1994)


Subsidiaries
see this list


Website
www.sktelecom.com


SK Telecom Co., Ltd. (Hangul: SK텔레콤 or 에스케이텔레콤) (full name: Sunkyoung Telecom) is a South Korean wireless telecommunications operator, it is part of the SK Group, one of the country's largest chaebols.
SK Telecom is South Korea's largest wireless carrier, it leads the local market with 50.5 percent share as of 2008.[2] Since its creation in 1984, the company has evolved from a first generation analog cellular system, to second generation CDMA, then to the world's first third-generation synchronized IMT-2000 cellular system. SK Telecom also became the world’s first carrier to commercialize HSDPA in May 2006. SK expanded into the landline market by acquiring second-rated fixed-line operator Hanaro Telecom in February 2008.
The company’s online brands include "Nate," a web portal; "June," a mobile multimedia service; "Moneta," an e-banking mobile app; "Nate Drive," a telematics service and "Digital Home," an online interface to remote-control household appliances.[3]
Online services are offered through tech subsidiary SK Communications, which also dominates the social networks market in South Korea. "Cyworld" is the largest social media site by membership and "NateOn" is the number one instant messaging client.[4]
In 2004, SK Telecom launched "Hanbyul," the world’s first DMB satellite. TU Media, SK Telecom's digital media arm, handles DMB TV broadcasts.
In November 2015 SK Telecom announced signing a deal to acquire CJ HelloVision, the country's largest cable and Internet operator, with the view to merge it with its own cable unit, SK Broadband.[5] The acquisition, which will make SK Broadband the No. 2 paid cable broadcaster following KT,[6] is being opposed by competitors, who charge that the merger will help SK unfairly dominate the market.[7][8]



Contents


1 History

1.1 1984–1993: Early Years
1.2 1994–1996: Privatization and the CDMA standard
1.3 1997–2000: International expansion
1.4 2001–2007: Cellular internet and market accrual
1.5 2008-present: Landline and new technologies


2 Services
3 International markets

3.1 China
3.2 United States

3.2.1 Helio
3.2.2 Mobile Money Ventures
3.2.3 SK Telecom Americas Innopartners


3.3 Vietnam


4 Subsidiaries

4.1 NetsGo
4.2 SK Broadband
4.3 SK Communications
4.4 SK Planet
4.5 SK Telink
4.6 TU Media
4.7 iriver


5 Employee conditions
6 See also
7 References
8 External links



History[edit]
SK Telecom was established in March 1984 under the name Korea Mobile Telecommunications Services Corp. (KMTSC; Hangul: 한국 이동 통신 서비스), but was renamed Korea Mobile Telecommunications Corp. (KMTC; Hangul: 한국 이동 통신) in May 1988. It was a subsidiary of the state monopoly phone company, Korea Telecom (now known as KT Corp.) until KT sold it off in 1993.[9] In June 1994 SK Group (Formerly Sunkyong Group) became Korea Mobile Telecommunications Corporation's largest shareholder. KMTC officially joined the SK Group in January 1997 and changed its name to SK Telecom in March of that year. In October 2000, SK Telecom became the second operator in the world after NTT DoCoMo to launch a commercial 3G service using W-CDMA technology. In January 2002, this was followed up by launching the world's first CDMA2000 1xEV-DO network, offering greatly increased data transmission speeds to preexisting 2G networks.
In May 2005, SK Telecom divested 60 percent of SK Teletech stock to cellphone maker Pantech.[10] SK remains the second largest shareholder by holding on to the rest of Teletech's stock. In 2006, the well-known "SKY" brand of mobile devices became fully owned by Pantech as it finalized its takeover of SK Teletech.
1984–1993: Early Years[edit]
Founded on March 29, 1984 as Korea Mobile Telecommunications Services Corp., the state-owned carrier introduced pagers and car phones to the Korean market. May 1984 saw the launch of the car phone service. Korea Mobile changed its name to Korea Mobile Telecommunications Corp. (KMTC) in May 1988. In July, AMPS cellular network was initially launched in Seoul metropolitan area. By 1991 nationwide coverage was complete.
In April 1993, the South Korean government —through KMTC— adopted CDMA as the national cellular telephone system.[11]
1994–1996: Privatization and the CDMA standard[edit]
Through privatization, SK Group became Korea Mobile Telecommunications Corp.'s largest shareholder in June 1994.
In October 1994, Korea's first CDMA system was introduced to the public for the first time.
In January 1995, KMTC reached the one million subscriber mark. Korea Mobile Telecommuncations became the third Korean firm to be listed on the NYSE exchange (ADR) in June 1996. Later that year South Korea got its first commercial CDMA (IS-95A) network. Operating in Seoul in October, it is considered one of the world's earliest commercial CDMA networks.
1997–2000: International expansion[edit]
SK Group completed its takeover of KMTC in January 1997, as it became the world's sixth carrier to attain ten million subscriptions. Around that time, it also began constructing the Northeast Asian CDMA belt encompassing China, Japan, Vietnam, and the rest of the Asian continent.
In March 1997, to reflect new changes, KMTC changed its name to SK Telecom, and in October, NetsGo, an online service, was launched.

In June 1998, SK Telink, the international call service division, started offering commercial overseas call service. In December 1998, SK Teletech launched its first handset. In April 1999, SK Telecom entered the Mongolian market by co-founding Skytel LLC with nearly 30 percent ownership stake.
TTL, a wireless plan targeting younger users, and nTOP, a cellular internet service were launched in July and October 1999, respectively.
In December 1999, SK Telecom surpassed ten million subscriber mark, the following month, it launched the world’s first commercial CDMA2000 service. By the end of the year the carrier won a contract for asynchronous IMT-2000 (WCDMA) facility.[12]
2001–2007: Cellular internet and market accrual[edit]
The new millennium ushered in an era of cross-platform online networks that saw efforts to integrate mobile services, as SK Telecom was exploring new value-creating models such as m-Commerce and satellite DMB Service. In January 2002, an acquisition of Shinsegi Telecomm Inc. was completed.[13] Also in January, the company deployed world’s first commercial synchronous IMT-2000 facility.
In March 2002, the carrier struck international roaming deals between countries using CDMA and GSM networks. An agreement was signed with Israel's Pele-Phone in April to sell proprietary software that will operate on the carrier's existing CDMA network and future 1x-CDMA network.[14] In July, a MoU was signed with China Unicom to establish a joint venture. In November two mobile applications ‘June’ and ‘Moneta’ were launched. In July 2003, S-Fone, a commercial CDMA network became operative in Vietnam. In August 2003, June became the world's first 3G service to have one million subscribers. In February 2004, SK won a contract for a joint venture with China Unicom, called UNISK.

March 2004 marked a new breakthrough with the launch of Hanbyul, the world’s first DMB satellite.
MelOn, an online music store was launched in November 2004. ‘1mm’ and ‘Loview,’ a digital photo frame service were launched in April and November 2005, respectively. By December, MelOn had four million subscribers.

SK Telecom started 2006 with record revenues of KRW 10 trillion ($9.28 billion). In May the world's first commercial HSDPA handset was released. May also saw the carrier's entry into the U.S. wireless communication market with Helio. In June, SK Telecom signed a strategic partnership with China Unicom to purchase CB worth $1 billion in its subsidiary, China Unicom Hong Kong. In the same month SK deployed its WiBro internet network. In April 2007, a project to create TD-SCDMA, China's 3G wireless broadbnad equivalent was signed with the Chinese government. Around that time, S-Fone had two million subscribers in Vietnam.
2008-present: Landline and new technologies[edit]
In November 2008 SK signed an agreement to buy a controlling stake of fixed-line phone company Hanaro Telecom for 1.09 trillion won ($1.15 billion) from a consortium led by AIG and Newbridge Capital. The new entity will be the second-largest telecom firm in terms of total assets and revenues next to KT Corp.[15]
In 2013 SK Telecom was the world's first operator to offer a commercial LTE-Advanced network. This coincided with the release of the Samsung Galaxy S4 LTE-A model, which offered a step-up CPU (Snapdragon 800 vs. Snapdragon 600 used in the regular model), and also LTE-Advanced capabilities. SK Telecom supported this handset at launch.[16]
On July 6, 2013, it was reported that Apple was in talks with SK Telecom, to release the iPhone 5s model on SK's LTE Advanced network.[17]
Services[edit]
As of September 2012, SK Telecom operates 2G IS-95/CDMA 2000, 3G WCDMA/HSPA+, 4G Mobile WiMAX, and LTE networks.

Frequencies used by SK Telecom's Network in Korea

Frequency
Frequency
band
Frequency
width
(MHz)
Generation
Radio interface
Notes


800 MHz (824-829, 869-874)

10
2G
CDMA



850 MHz (829-839, 874-884)
5
20
3.9G
LTE
(main frequency)


1800 MHz (1715-1725, 1730-1735, 1810-1830)
3
35
3.9G
LTE



2100 MHz (1930-1940, 2120-2130)
1
20
3.9G
LTE



2100 MHz (1940-1960, 2130-2150)
1
40
3.5G
UMTS/HSPA



2300 MHz (2300-2327)

27
3.9G
Mobile WiMAX



2G network supports CDMA (IS-95A/B), CDMA2000, and EV-DO. EV-DO handsets are marked with its service name "June." 3G network supports WCDMA, HSPA, and HSPA+. SK Telecom has the best HSPA+ coverage in South Korea. HSPA+ is available in 50+ major cities and towns, while KT HSPA+ is available in selected metropolitan areas. 3.9G LTE, which uses both band 5 and band 3, supports multi-carrier technology, which SK Telecom claims to be the first operator to offer.
From May 2005 to September 2012, SK Telecom provided S-DMB through its subsidiary TU Media (later SK Telink). S-DMB service was ceased in September 2012 after significant losses in its final years.[18]
SK Telecom also provides online multiplatform entertainment, business and financial services:

MelOn: Introduced in November 2004, MelOn is SK Telecom's music e-store, which allows users to download or stream music over the internet. Music can be played on mobile phones, digital audio players, portable media players and digital cameras. Users can create their own ringtones. In 2009, LOEN Entertainment, an SK Group record label, became the company-in-charge of running MelOn. An Indonesian version of MelOn was created in cooperation with PT Telkom Indonesia.
m-Finance: an online banking system introduced in 2001, allows users to take charge of all their financial transactions. Properly equipped mobile phones can do basic banking such as wire transfers and checking balances as well as stock trading and credit card services. Users can also withdraw cash from ATMs using their phones.
Digital Home: Digital Home allows users to control and monitor home appliances, lighting, security systems and fire alarms remotely. The service utilizes high-speed internet, telephone and cable networks to achieve functionality.
Mobile RFID (m-RFID): Phones with embedded RF readers can give users key information about a product before making a purchase. SK Telecom has tested this technology for six applications including, safety, authentication, package tracking, supply chain management, digital content usage and location-based services.

International markets[edit]
SK Telecom is currently putting its efforts in expanding into global markets, such as Vietnam, U.S., and China. The company is also forging strategic alliances with other global carriers and IT businesses.
China[edit]
In 2000, SK Telecom first entered China, later forming a joint venture with China Unicom for wireless Internet service in February 2004. This joint venture between a foreign and local company, UNISK, is the first of its kind in China.
In 2006, SK Telecom bought $1 billion worth of convertible bonds of China Unicom Hong Kong, a division of China Unicom and agreed to cooperate in joint sourcing of handsets, development of additional services, platform development, marketing and distribution, customer relationship management, and network development. One result of this partnership is jointly developing handsets to be sourced by Samsung, LG, and Motorola.
In August 2006, SK Telecom signed an MoU making it the first non-Chinese company to participate in the TD-SCDMA Project. Under the agreement SK Telecom will work with China's National Development and Reform Commission (NDRC) on development of TD-SCDMA, China's 3G Internet standard equivalent.
United States[edit]
Helio[edit]
Main article: Helio (wireless carrier)
On January 26, 2005, SK Telecom announced that it had formed a $440 million joint venture with Earthlink to form a new U.S. cellular carrier named SK-Earthlink, later that year, the name was changed to Helio. Combined with Earthlink, Helio is expected to offer a variety of advanced mobile devices, many of which are already available in Korea. These models would be refined and updated for use by tech-savvy American consumers, allowing for the first time handsets with functionalities previously unavailable in the U.S. market.
The now-defunct venture operated on the premise of being a mobile virtual network operator (MVNO), using CDMA 1xEVDO network capacity leased from Sprint Nextel. In 2007, SK Telecom began talks to purchase a stake in Sprint Nextel,[19] however by 2008 it had backed away from the deal.[20]
On June 27, 2008, it was reported that Helio was being acquired in an all-stock deal by Virgin Mobile; for a net acquisition price of $39 million —–a far cry from the $500 million originally invested in the venture. All staff were eliminated and the business ceased as a going concern[21]
Mobile Money Ventures[edit]
On March 6, 2008, SK Telecom launched Mobile Money Ventures, a joint venture with Citibank. MMV designs, develops, implements, and supports mobile financial services solutions on a global scale. Its Mobile Money Platform can support existing mobile banking services as well as next generation services like P2P payments and NFC payments.[22]
On March 28, 2011, SK Telecom made a surprise bid to acquire bankrupt movie/game rental company Blockbuster Inc. SK bid $284.5 million for Blockbuster, but ended up losing to Dish Network.
SK Telecom Americas Innopartners[edit]
On March 4, 2014, SK Telecom announced that its U.S. arm, SK Telecom Americas, Inc. completed the establishment of the startup accelerator SK Telecom Americas Innopartners.[23] The accelerator invests in early stage core technology startups. It is set up to incubate 11 startups at the same time, an currently is hosting three of them (Etopus, N43, Pavilion Data).[24]
Vietnam[edit]
Main article: S-Fone
In September 2001, SK Telecom established S-Telecom, through a Business Cooperation Contract (BCC) with SPT (Saigon Postel), a Vietnamese phone company with a CDMA license.
S-Telecom, Vietnam's first CDMA wireless carrier, launched commercial services in July 2003 and has since upgraded its network to CDMA2000 1xEV-DO to meet growing demand. Currently 64 cities including Ho Chi Minh City and Hanoi are served under the S-Fone brand.
As of October 2006, the company was providing EV-DO wireless internet services in five major cities including Hanoi and Ho Chi Minh City. S-Fone subscribers reached two million in April 2007, a little over three years after its start.
Subsidiaries[edit]
SK Telecom has a number of subsidiaries that support its growth. In 2006, SK Communications expanded into new markets with an enhanced version of Korea's leading social networking site Cyworld. At home, NateOn is the leading messenger service with more than 13 million users as of 2006. SK Telink, the international telephony division, launched international Korean SMS messaging in the U.S., today it operates in more than 170 countries. TU Media, the nationwide satellite Digital Multimedia Broadcasting (DMB) service, is also making fast growth, attracting over one million subscribers in 2006.
NetsGo[edit]
With Thrunet and Hanaro controlling nearly half of the growing high-speed Internet market, SK Telecom entered the market in late 1999 with Dream NetsGo, a cable Internet provider that offered its services in a partnership with local cable TV operator Dreamcity Media. It provided Internet access at a speed of up to 10 Mbit/s using the cable TV network, which had 120,000 subscribers at the time.[25] In 2002 NetsGo merged with Lycos Korea to form SK Communications.
SK Broadband[edit]
Main article: SK Broadband
Founded as Hanaro Telecom, Inc. in 1997 and was the only fixed-line and cable operator beside the state-owned KT. It provides local, domestic long-distance and international long-distance fixed-line telephone services to residential and commercial subscribers. After acquiring Thrunet, Korea's second-rated broadband company in 2005, Hanaro became a provider of broadband Internet access service and other Internet-related services, including video-on-demand and IPTV services.
Other Internet-related businesses include intelligent network, Internet leased lines, domestic leased line, VPN, Internet data center, and CDN services. Its new businesses include platform business, business-to-business (B2B) solutions business, healthcare business.
The company's Internet Protocol (IP)-based central exchange system provides Centrex functions (internal calls, customer service numbers, etc.) and offers additional features, such as multiple bell tones, forwarding desk (receptionist function), conference call, call center and voice message functions. It also provides managed services and Information and Communications Technology (ICT) consulting services.[26] Hanaro Telecom was acquired by SK Telecom in 2008 and became a wholly owned subsidiary in mid 2015.[27]
SK Communications[edit]
Main article: SK Communications
Founded in 1999 as Lycos Korea,[28] SK Communications is the technology company responsible for some of the most successful internet tools and products in the Korean market. After the company's 2002 takeover by SK Telecom, online portal Nate was launched and has since grown to be one of the most popular portals in Korea. The largest social media site in Korea, Cyworld has seen a sharp rise in its membership, with members reaching 20 million from 16 million in 2005. SK Communications also provides the top instant messaging service NateOn. As of December 2006, NateOn had 13 million users and led the local market. In 2006, the Nate.com portal was revamped as a Web 2.0 user-centric site with an emphasis on personalized content and social networking. Cyworld II also re-launched with Web 2.0 offerings, including a personalized mini-homepage, personalized search, UCC video and other user-customizable Web-based applications.
SK Communications is currently extending its online businesses into the global market. In 2006, localized versions of Cyworld were launched in China, Germany, Japan, Taiwan, the U.S., and Vietnam. To make full use of its premium base, the tech firm is building a portfolio of content providers, including education company Etoos; consumer shopping services under the Cymarket brand, which leverage Cyworld’s network and traffic; gaming subsidiary SK i-media; and Egloos, the leading independent blogging service in Korea. In addition, the company acquired a significant stake (24.4%) in a powerful online search engine, Empas, for KRW 37.2 billion.
SK Planet[edit]
SK Planet is the e-commerce division of SK headquartered in Pangyo. Business areas include digital contents, integrated commerce and marketing communication.
Its October 2011 launch marked the reorganization of T Store.[29] SK Planet launched qiip, an app store in Japan.[30] 11st is one of the biggest online store complexes in South Korea under the management of SK Planet.[31] Other products include Smart Wallet, a mobile wallet service, OK Cashbag, an integrated mileage service, and Gifticon, a mobile voucher service. As part of the integrated commerce strategy these services are being combined under the brand Syrup.[32]
On November 14, 2014, SK Planet formed a joint venture with Celcom Axiata Berhad of Malaysia.[33] The new e-commerce company is known as Celcom Planet Sdn. Bhd., its online outlet is called 11street Malaysia.
SK Telink[edit]
Main article: SK Telink
Founded in April 1998 as an international telephony service provider, SK Telink has grown into a major player in the international calling market. International call services are offered under the ‘00700’ brand. Building on the commercial long-distance telephony and value-added services launched in 2005, the carrier began offering Korean text messaging in June 2006 in the U.S. The service allows subscribers send and receive Korean text messages in the U.S., as well as to and from Korea.
TU Media[edit]
Main article: TU Media
Established in December 2003, TU Media Corp. introduced a new digital media service —satellite Digital Multimedia Broadcasting (DMB). Subscribers can now view satellite TV broadcasts on their portable handsets or via vehicle-mounted terminals. As of December 2006, subscribers to TU Media topped one million, up from 372,000 in 2005. Its nationwide DMB is available on 37 channels, consisting of 16 video, 20 audio and one data, and provides programs on education, games, drama, music, news and culture. In 2006, TU Media launched TUBOX, a pay-per-view movie channel that allows subscribers to see movies prior to DVD release. In addition to South Korea's 84 cities, TU Media provides service in express highways and Seoul metropolitan subways. DMB coverage was later expanded to include the Korea Train eXpress (KTX) Seoul to Busan line, Busan subways and 10 metropolitan Seoul local highways. In 2010 TU Media was merged with another subsidiary, SK Telink —Korea's leading international call service provider. DMB broadcasts ended two years later as it became uncompetitive in the mobile TV market.
iriver[edit]
Further information: iriver and ReignCom
iriver Inc. (formerly ReignCom) is a South Korean electronics and entertainment company founded in 1999 by seven former Samsung executives. SK Telecom acquired it from Vogo Fund in 2014.[34]
Employee conditions[edit]
SK Telecom has its own workers union. SK Telecom abides by the Korean Labor Law and is executing a retirement age of 58. Unless an employee commits a crime more serious than imprisonment or an act in violation of ethical management of SK Telecom, employees are guaranteed to work until they reach the retirement age. SK Telecom follows a management system called SKMS (SK Management System), created by SK Companies.
See also[edit]


South Korea portal
Companies portal



SK Group
SK Teletech (Now merged with Pantech & Sky Electronics)
Cyworld
KT Corporation
LG Uplus
TU Media
SK Wyverns
SK Telecom T1

References[edit]


^ "SKM Income Statement". Yahoo! Finance. 
^ Lee Sun-young (May 5, 2008). "Mobile operators pressured to cut call, message rates". Korea Herald. naver.com. Retrieved May 8, 2008. 
^ "Brand History". SK Telecom Co., LTD. 
^ "Evolution of Social Network Service into Media: Cyworld Case (PDF)". SK Communications. October 2008. 
^ Lee Min-hyung (November 2, 2015). "SKT inks deal to buy CJ HelloVision". Korea Times. 
^ JEON YOUNG-SEON, KIM JI-YOON (November 2, 2015). "SK Telecom will buy cable firm". Joongang Media Network. 
^ "SK Telecom Sets out New Vision with Takeover Amid Criticism". Seoul: Kobiz Media Co., Ltd. Korea Bizwire. December 2, 2015. 
^ 윤경, 현 (2015-12-01). "SKT, CJ헬로비전 인수합병 신청…내년 2월 전 판가름(종합)". Yonhap News (in Korean). 
^ Whasun Jho (2014). Building Telecom Markets: Evolution of Governance in the Korean Mobile Telecommunication Market. p. 140. ISBN 978-1461478881. 
^ "Pantech & Curitel Buys Control Of SK Teletech". Phone Factor, LLC. May 4, 2005. 
^ "CDMA History". CDG. 
^ Cho Hyung-rae (December 15, 2000). "SK Telecom, Korea Telecom Win IMT-2000 Licenses". The Chosun Ilbo. Chosun.com. 
^ "Korea approves takeover of Shinsegi". Reuters. April 26, 2000. 
^ Nadau, Efi (April 30, 2004). "Pele-Phone signs $7m value added service deal with SK Telecom". Globes. 
^ Jin Hyun-joo (February 21, 2008). "SKT's Hanaro buy gives birth to mobile giant". The Korea Herald. 
^ Lawler, Richard (June 25, 2013). "SK Telecom launches the world's first LTE-Advanced network, and the Galaxy S4 LTE-A". Engadget. 
^ Christie, Robert (July 5, 2013). "iPhone 5s Release Date Rumors: New Phone Will Have 4G LTE Advanced Capabilities". Hngn. 
^ "Satellite DMB soon to become history". JoongAng Ilbo Co., Ltd. (in Korean). Joins MSN. July 4, 2012. 
^ Koh Byung-joon (July 25, 2007). "SK TELECOM PUSHING TO ACQUIRE US TELCO SPRINT NEXTEL". Comcast Finance. Retrieved August 3, 2007. 
^ Dave Hayes (July 17, 2008). "SK Telecom confirms it has no plans to buy Sprint". Retrieved 2011-01-17. 
^ Ryan Block (June 20, 2008). "Helio's flame going out: stores to shutter, customers heading to Virgin?". The Kansas City Star. 
^ "Citi: Mobile Venture Will Go Well Beyond Basics." American Banker. March 7, 2008.
^ "SK Telecom Growing New Seeds in Silicon Valley". SK Holdings. March 4, 2014. 
^ "Portfolio". SK Telecom Americas Innopartners. 
^ "SK Telecom Launches High-Speed Internet Service". Telecompaper. December 3, 1999. 
^ "SK Broadband Co Ltd- KOSDAQ-033630 Quotes & News". Google Finance. 
^ "Rating Action: Moody's affirms SK Telecom's A3 ratings on announced acquisition of SK Broadband; outlook remains stable". Moody's Investor Service. March 23, 2015. 
^ "Company History". SK Communications. 
^ "Inspiring everyone on the planet". SK Planet. 
^ SK플래닛, 앱스토어 '킵(qiip)'으로 일본시장 공략 (in Korean)
^ 11st Introduction
^ SK Planet Set to Change the Dynamics of Offline Commerce Market Valued at KRW 230 Trillion
^ "Celcom Axiata Bhd and SK Planet Form Joint Venture Company". Bloomberg. 
^ SKT Acquires iriver, from the Maeil Business Newspaper


External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to SK Telecom.



SK Telecom website (Korean / English)
SK Telecom T world website
SK Telecom's channel on YouTube
SK Telecom Americas website (English)







v
t
e


SK



Subsidiaries





Energy & Chemicals




SK Innvotion
SK Energy
SK Global Chemical
SK Lubricants
SK Incheon Petrochem
SK Trading International
SK Chemicals
SKC
SK E&S
SK Gas
SK Biopharmaceuticals






Information, Telecommunication & Semiconductor




SK Telecom
SK C&C
SK Planet
SK Hynix
SK Broadband
SK Telesys
SK Telink
SK Communications

Nate








Marketing & Service




SK Networks
SK E&C
SK Shipping
SK Security











Sports



SK Wyverns
Jeju United
Seoul SK Knights
SK Telecom T1
SK Sugar Gliders
SK Hawks












v
t
e


kt



Communication



KT CS
KT IS
KT Linkus
KT M&S
KT Powertel
KT Sat
KT Submarine
KT WiBro Infrastructure








IT



Initech
KT DS
KT ENS
KT-SB Data Service
KT Softnics
NexR





Media and Contents



Enswers, Inc.
KTH
KT InnoEdu
KT Media Hub
KT Music
KT OIC
KT SkyLife
USTREAM Korea (JV with Ustream Inc.)





Convergence



BC Card
Best Partners
Centios (JV with Cisco Systems)
H&C Network
KT Capital
KT Commerce
KT Estate
KT MHows
KT TeleCop
Nasmedia
Smartro
VP





Sports



Busan KT Sonicboom
KT Golf Team
KT Hockey Team
KT Rolster
KT Shooting Team
KT Wiz





Former Affiliates



KT Cloudware (acquired by KT DS)
Dacom (acquired by LG)
KTF (defunct)
KT FDS (acquired by Tongyang Group)
KT Rental (acquired by Lotte)
KT Tech (defunct)
Korea Mobile Telecommunications (acquired by SK Group)
Sidus (acquired by Locus Corp.)





Related Articles



NESPOT
Olleh TV












v
t
e


Members of the Bridge Alliance






 Bharti Airtel
 AIS
 CSL
 CTM
 Globe
 Maxis
 MobiFone
 Optus
 Singtel
 SK Telecom
 SoftBank
 STC
 Taiwan Mobile
 Telkomcel
 Telkomsel
 VIVA
 VIVA












v
t
e


S&P Asia 50 companies






AIA Group
BOC Hong Kong (Holdings)
Cathay Financial Holding
China Construction Bank
China Life Insurance
China Mobile
China Petroleum & Chemical
China Steel
Chunghwa Telecom
CK Hutchison Holdings
CLP Holdings
CNOOC Limited
CTBC Financial Holding
DBS Group
Delta Electronics
Formosa Chem & Fibre
Formosa Plastics
Fubon Financial Holding
Galaxy Entertainment Group
Hang Seng Bank
Hon Hai Precision Industry
Hong Kong and China Gas
Hong Kong Exchanges and Clearing
Hyundai Heavy Industries
Hyundai Mobis
Hyundai Motor
Industrial and Commercial Bank of China
Jardine Matheson
KB Financial Group
Keppel
Kia Motors
KT&G
LG Chem
Li & Fung
Lippo Group
MediaTek
Nan Ya Plastics
Oversea-Chinese Banking Corporation
PetroChina
Ping An Insurance
POSCO
Power Assets Holdings
Samsung Electronics
Sands China
Shinhan Financial Group
Singapore Telecommunications
Sun Hung Kai Properties
Taiwan Semiconductor Manufacturing
United Overseas Bank
Want Want China Holdings












v
t
e


Mobile network operators of South Korea




SK Telecom · KT · LG Uplus











v
t
e


Telecommunications



History




Beacon
Broadcasting
Cable protection system
Cable TV
Communications satellite
Computer network
Drums
Electrical telegraph
Fax
Heliographs
Hydraulic telegraph
Internet
Mass media
Mobile phone
Optical telecommunication
Optical telegraphy
Pager
Photophone
Prepaid mobile phone
Radio
Radiotelephone
Satellite communications
Semaphore
Smartphone
Smoke signals
Telecommunications history
Telautograph
Telegraphy
Teleprinter (teletype)
Telephone
The Telephone Cases
Television
Timeline of communication technology
Undersea telegraph line
Videoconferencing
Videophone
Videotelephony
Whistled language





Pioneers



Edwin Howard Armstrong
John Logie Baird
Paul Baran
Alexander Graham Bell
Tim Berners-Lee
Jagadish Chandra Bose
Vint Cerf
Claude Chappe
Donald Davies
Lee de Forest
Philo Farnsworth
Reginald Fessenden
Elisha Gray
Erna Schneider Hoover
Charles K. Kao
Hedy Lamarr
Innocenzo Manzetti
Guglielmo Marconi
Antonio Meucci
Radia Perlman
Alexander Stepanovich Popov
Johann Philipp Reis
Nikola Tesla
Camille Tissot
Alfred Vail
Charles Wheatstone
Vladimir K. Zworykin





Transmission
media



Characteristic impedance
Coaxial cable
Electromagnetic radiation
Electrical cable
Free-space optical communication
Heaviside condition
Loading coil
Molecular communication
Optical fiber
Telegrapher's equations





Network topology
and switching



Links
Nodes
Terminal node
Network switching (circuit
packet)
Telephone exchange





Multiplexing



Space-division
Frequency-division
Time-division
Polarization-division
Orbital angular-momentum
Code-division





Networks



ARPANET
BITNET
Cellular network
Computer
CYCLADES
Ethernet
FidoNet
Internet
ISDN
LAN
Mobile
NGN
NPL network
Public Switched Telephone
Radio
Telecommunications equipment
Television
Telex
WAN
Wireless
World Wide Web








 Category
 Portal












v
t
e


Major information technology companies






Largest IT companies
Largest Internet companies
Largest software companies





Consulting and
outsourcing



Accenture
Atos
Booz Allen Hamilton
BMC Software
BT Global Services
CACI
Capgemini
CGI Group
Cognizant
Deloitte
Digital China
DXC Technology
Fujitsu
HCL Technologies
Hitachi Consulting
IBM Global Services
Indra Sistemas
Infosys
Infor
KPMG
Leidos
NEC
NTT DATA
Orange Business Services
T-Systems
Tata Consultancy Services
Tech Mahindra
Unisys
Wipro





Imaging



Canon Inc.
HP Inc.
Eastman Kodak
Fujifilm
Konica Minolta
Kyocera
Lexmark
Nikon
Olympus Corporation
Panasonic
Ricoh
Samsung Electronics
Seiko Epson
Sharp
Sony
Toshiba
Xerox





Information storage



ADATA
Dell Technologies
Dell EMC
Fujitsu
Hitachi Data Systems
Hewlett Packard Enterprise
IBM
Kingston Technology
LenovoEMC
NetApp
Oracle Corporation
Plextor
Samsung Electronics
Seagate Technology
Silicon Power
Sony
Toshiba
Transcend Information
Western Digital (SanDisk)





Internet



Baidu
Facebook
Google
IAC/InterActiveCorp
Microsoft
Naver
NetEase
Netflix
Oath
Tencent
Twitter
Uber
Vox Media
Yandex





Cloud computing




Akamai Technologies
Amazon Web Services
Google
IBM
Microsoft
Oracle Corporation
Rackspace
Salesforce.com








E-commerce only




Alibaba Group
Amazon.com
eBay
Flipkart
Groupon
JD.com
Shopify
Rakuten








Mainframes



Fujitsu
IBM





Mobile devices



Acer Inc.
Amazon.com
Apple
Asus
BBK Electronics (OPPO, OnePlus, Vivo)
BlackBerry Limited
Hisense
HTC
Huawei
I-Mobile
Karbonn Mobiles
Lava Mobiles (XOLO)
Lenovo (Motorola Mobility)
LG Electronics
Meizu
Micromax Informatics (YU Televentures)
Microsoft
Nokia
Panasonic
Samsung
Sony
TCL Corporation
True
Xiaomi
ZTE





Networking equipment



Avaya
Cisco Systems
Ericsson
Fujitsu
Hewlett Packard Enterprise
Huawei
Juniper Networks
Motorola Solutions
NEC
Nokia
Qualcomm
ZTE





OEMs



Celestica
Compal Electronics
Flextronics
Foxconn
Jabil
Pegatron
Quanta
Sanmina Corporation
TPV Technology
Wistron Corporation





Personal computers
and servers



Acer Inc.
Apple Inc.
Asus
Dell
Fujitsu
HP Inc.
Lenovo
LG Electronics
NEC
Panasonic
Positivo
Samsung Electronics
Toshiba





Servers only




Cisco Systems
Hewlett Packard Enterprise
IBM
Inspur
Oracle Corporation








Financial technology



Euronet Worldwide
FIS
PayPal
Fiserv
Jack Henry
SWIFT
Square





Point of sale



Casio
NCR
Panasonic
Samsung Electronics
Seiko Epson
Sharp
Star Micronics
Toshiba
Wincor Nixdorf





Semiconductors



Advanced Micro Devices
Broadcom
Fujitsu
Infineon Technologies
Integrated Micro-Electronics, Inc.
Intel
LG Electronics
Marvell Technology Group
MediaTek
Micron Technology
Nvidia
NXP Semiconductors (Freescale)
ON Semiconductor
Panasonic
Qualcomm
Renesas Electronics
Samsung Electronics
SK Hynix
Sony
STMicroelectronics
Texas Instruments
Toshiba
VIA Technologies





Foundries




GlobalFoundries
TSMC
United Microelectronics Corporation
SMIC








Equipment




Applied Materials
KLA-Tencor
Lam Research
Tokyo Electron








Software



Adobe Systems
Amadeus IT Group
Apple Inc.
Autodesk
BMC Software
CA Technologies
FIS
Google
Hewlett Packard Enterprise
IBM
Intuit
Infor
Microsoft
Oracle Corporation
Sage Group
SAP SE
Symantec
VMware





Telecommunications
services



América Móvil
AT&T
Bell Canada
Bezeq
Bharti Airtel
Bharat Sanchar Nigam Limited
BT Group
CenturyLink
China Mobile
China Telecommunications Corporation

China Telecom


China Unicom
Chunghwa Telecom
Comcast
Deutsche Telekom
Hutchison Asia
Idea Cellular
KDDI
KPN
KT Corporation
Mahanagar Telephone Nigam
MTN
MTS
Nippon
NTT DoCoMo
Oi
Orange S.A.
PCCW
Reliance
Shaw
Singtel
SK Telecom
SoftBank Mobile
Spark
Sprint Corporation
Swisscom
Tata Teleservices
Telecom Italia
Telefónica
Telenor
Telus
Telmex
Telstra
TPG
True
Türk Telekom
Veon
Verizon
Viettel
Vivendi
Vodafone





Travel technology



Amadeus IT Group
Sabre Corporation
Travelport





Video games



Activision Blizzard
Atari
Bandai Namco
Capcom‎
Electronic Arts
Epic Games
LucasArts
Koei Tecmo
Konami
NCsoft
Nexon
Nintendo
Sega
Sony
Square Enix
Take-Two Interactive
Tencent
Ubisoft
Warner Bros.






Methodology: FY2014/15 applicable revenues of over: group 1-3, 6-12 - US$3 billion; group 4 - US$2 billion; group 5,13,16 - US$1 billion










v
t
e


 KRX 100 companies of South Korea






AmorePacific
BNK Financial
Celltrion
Cheil Worldwide
CJ
CJ CheilJedang
CJ Korea Express
CJOS
Coway Group
Daelim
Daewoo International
Daewoo Securities
Daewoo Shipbuilding & Marine Engineering
DGB Financial Group
Dongbu Fire
Doosan
Doosan Heavy Industries & Construction
e-mart
Grand Korea Leisure
GS
GS Shop
Halla Visteon
Hana Financial
Hankook Tire
Hankook Tire Worldwide
Hansol
Hyundai Department Store
Hyundai Development Company
Hyundai Engineering & Construction
Hyundai Glovis
Hyundai Heavy Industries
Hyundai Marine & Fire Insurance
Hyundai Mipo Dockyard
Hyundai Mobis
Hyundai Motor Company
Hyundai Steel
Hyundai Wia
Industrial Bank of Korea
Kakao
Kangwon Land
KB Financial
KCC
Kia Motors
KEPCO
KEPCO E&C
KEPCO KPS
Korea Gas
Korea Investment Holdings
Korea Zinc
KT
KT&G
Kumho Petrochemical
LF
LG
LG Chem
LG Electronics
LG Household & Health Care
LG International
LG Uplus
LIG
LOEN
Lotte Chemical
Lotte Shopping
LS
LS Industrial Systems
Mirae Asset Securities
Naver
NCSOFT
Nongwoo Bio
OCI
Orion
Osstem Implant
POSCO
S1
S-Oil
S.M. Entertainment
Samsung Card
Samsung C&T
Samsung Electro-Mechanics
Samsung Electronics
Samsung Engineering
Samsung Fire & Marine
Samsung Heavy Industries
Samsung Life
Samsung SDI
Samsung Securities
Samsung Techwin
Seoul Semiconductor
SFA Engineering
Shinhan Group
Shinsegae
SK
SK C&C
SK Hynix
SK Innovation
SK Telecom
The Basic House
Woori Financial
Youngone
Yuhan










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=SK_Telecom&oldid=791441254"					
Categories: 1984 establishments in South KoreaCompanies based in SeoulCompanies listed on the Korea Stock ExchangeCompanies listed on the New York Stock ExchangeMobile phone companies of South KoreaSK subsidiariesSouth Korean brandsTelecommunications companies established in 1984Telecommunications companies of South KoreaHidden categories: CS1 Korean-language sources (ko)Pages using deprecated image syntaxArticles containing Korean-language text 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


AsturianuDanskDeutschEspañolفارسیFrançais한국어IdoBahasa IndonesiaItalianoBahasa Melayu日本語PortuguêsРусскийTürkçe中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 20 July 2017, at 08:32.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









SK Group - Wikipedia






















 






SK Group

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


SK Group





The SK Group Headquarters in January 2014.




Native name

에스케이 그룹



Type

Public


Industry
Conglomerate


Founded
April 8, 1953; 64 years ago (1953-04-08)


Headquarters
Seoul, South Korea



Key people

Chey Tae-won, Chairman & CEO
Cho Dae-sik, Chairman of the SUPEX Council (de facto head)[1]


Products
Energy & Chemicals, Telecommunications,
Trading & Services, Semiconductors, Construction, Shipping


Revenue
 ₩ 125.917 trillion (2016) [2]


Total assets
 ₩ 170.697 trillion (2016)[2]



Number of employees

Korea: 83,645 (2016)[2]
Overseas: ?


Website
www.sk.com


SK Group (Korean: SK그룹, 에스케이그룹), also known as SK Holdings, is one of the largest conglomerates (chaebol) in South Korea. SK Group is composed of 95 subsidiary and affiliate companies that share the SK brand and culture. It changed its name from Sunkyoung Group (Korean: 선경그룹, Hanja : 鮮京그룹) to SK Group in 1997.
SK Holdings ranked 57th in the 2013 Fortune Global 500.[3] SK Group has more than 70,000 employees who work from 113 offices worldwide. While its largest businesses are primarily involved in the chemical, petroleum and energy industries, it also has South Korea's largest wireless mobile phone service provider, SK Telecom, and provides services in construction, shipping, marketing, local telephone, high-speed Internet, and wireless broadband service WiBro. SK has further broadened its range of business to semiconductors, merging Hynix into SK Hynix, the world's second largest memory semiconductor manufacturer, on March 20, 2010.



Contents


1 History

1.1 Formation and early production
1.2 New businesses
1.3 Recent


2 Core businesses
3 Restructuring
4 Member companies
5 Management system
6 See also
7 References
8 External links



History[edit]
Formation and early production[edit]
As with many other chaebols, SK Group's chairmanship was 'inherited' from father to son: from its founder the late Chey John-hyun to its present chairman Chey Tae-won (eldest son). Chey Tae-won is married to the daughter of the former South Korean President Roh Tae-woo.[4]
SK Group began when the current founders acquired Sunkyong Textiles in 1953.[5] In 1958, the company manufactured Korea's first polyester fiber on company grounds. It established Sunkyong Fibers Ltd. in July 1969, and started to produce original yarn. In 1973, SK then established Sunkyong Oil, beginning a vertical integration strategy to manage production, "From Petroleum to Fibers”. That same year, the company acquired the Walkerhill Hotel.
In 1976, Sunkyong Corporation received an international trading company license from the Indian government.[6] In December 1980 SK purchased privately run Korea National Oil, making it Korea’s fifth largest conglomerate.[7]
In January 1988, crude oil was imported for processing to Korea from Yemen’s Marib oil field.
New businesses[edit]
In June 1994, SK entered Korea’s telecommunications business by becoming Korea Mobile Telecommunication Service's largest shareholder.[8] In January 1996, SK Telecom launched Korea’s first commercial CDMA cellular phone service in Incheon and Bucheon.[9]
In 1998, Management re-branded Sunkyong to SK.[10] In 1999, SK Chemicals developed third-generation (non cross resistant) platinum-complex anti-cancer agent.[11] Also, by focusing its research and development efforts on life sciences, SK Corporation developed YKP1358, a new drug candidate for schizophrenia, in 2003.[12][13]
In 2002, SK Telecom successfully launched the world’s first commercial CDMA 1X EV-DO technology, allowing it to offer 3G telecommunications service.[14][15] In 2004, SK Telecom enabled satellite DMB service by deploying the world’s first DMB satellite.[16] Moreover, in 2006, SK began revitalizing the 3.5-generation mobile phone market and in the following year, completed the construction of the national HSDPA network. In May 2006, SK Telecom started the world’s first commercial 3.5-generation HSDPA service, featuring high-quality video telephony and data transmission, and global roaming access.[17]
In 2005, SK Networks opened China's first two wholly foreign-owned, gas stations in Shenyang. Then, after exploring Brazilian mining area BM-C-8, SK Corporation developed an oil field where it confirmed the existence of more than 50 million barrels of oil deposits.[18]
SK Gas began developing resources overseas when it participated in two mining areas to the west of Russia’s Kamchatka peninsula in March 2006. In early 2006, SK Networks also developed Ecol-Green, a biodegradable plastic material. Incheon Oil officially started operations using the SK name in March 2006.[19] SK Energy is currently engaged in 27 oil fields in 15 countries worldwide
SKC imported propylene oxide (PO, a chemical used in manufacturing polyurethane) production technology from Germany in May 2006. It is scheduled to produce 100,000 tons of PO from 2008.[20]
At the end of 2005, SK Corp. developed a lithium ion battery separator (LiBS) for the first time in Korea, and started selling the product in 2006. In July 2007, SK Group adopted a holding company structure.[21][22] Under the re-organization, SK’s main entity, SK Corporation, was split into an investment company, now SK Holdings and an operating company, now SK Energy. The subsidiary companies that now operate under the central SK Holdings umbrella include: SK Energy, SK Telecom, SK Networks, SKC, SK E&S, SK Shipping and K Power.
Recent[edit]
In February 2017, SK acquired the acrylic acid business of Dow Chemical Company for $370 million,[23] and planned to increase battery production capacity from 1.9 to 3.9 GWh per year at the end of 2018, supplying Kia and Mercedes.[24]
On March 31, 2017, SK Innovation said that the electric vehicle battery plant it had in China had been closed since January of that year, after "Chinese joint venture partners halted production for no obvious reason."[25]
Core businesses[edit]
SK's core businesses are energy and telecommunications. Thirteen of SK companies are listed on the Korea Stock Exchange: SK Holdings, SK Innovation, SK Telecom, SKC, SKC Solmics, SK Chemicals, SK C&C, SK Networks, SK Gas, SK Communications, SK Broadband, SK Hynix and SK Securities. SK Telecom’s ADRs are also listed on the New York Stock Exchange.
Restructuring[edit]
SK restructured in 2007. Under the re-organization, SK's main entity, SK Corporation, was split into an investment company, now named SK Holdings, and an operating company, now named SK Energy. SK Energy produces batteries for CT&T and Hyundai electric vehicles.
Member companies[edit]




SK Building in Beijing CBD


Some of the member companies that now operate under the SK brand include SK E&C, SK Energy, SK Telecom, SK Broadband, SK Networks, SK Planet, SKC, SK E&S, SK Chemicals, SK Telesys, SK Shipping, SK Telink, SK Hynix, SK Corporation C&C, Walkerhill and SK Wyverns.
SKC (Korean: SKC or 에스케이씨, ), headquartered in Seocho-dong Seocho-gu Seoul, is the leading Korean company in chemical and film industry. SKC was founded and established in 1976 as previous name of Sunkyung Chemicals Ltd (Korean: 선경화학 (주)). SKC developed polyester films firstly in Korea, by its own efforts. Nowadays, SKC is one of the best polyester film makers in the world, supplying 10% of worldwide demands with its wide applications including labels, LCDs, and solar cells. With its main plant and R&D center located in Suwon, South Korea, it also operates large capacity of film plant (SKC Inc.) in Georgia, United States. SKC is now developing into one of the leading companies dealing with a variety of eco-friendly, advanced materials for the future energy and chemical industries such as biodegradable films, battery components, LEDs and photovoltaic materials.
SK Energy and SK Innovation (Korean: SK 에너지 or 에스케이 에너지 and SK 이노베이션 or 에스케이 이노베이션, ) is a South Korean enterprise formed as part of the July 1, 2007, reorganization of SK Corporation into a holding company and operating company, SK Holdings and SK Energy, respectively. In 2011, the petroleum business was spun off to become SK Energy. Simultaneously the chemical business was spun off to become SK Innovation. SK Energy was founded in 1962 as Korea’s first oil refiner-. In 1982, changed company name toYukong.SK Energy is an energy and petrochemical company with 5,000 employees, KRW 23.65 trillion in sales and 26 offices spanning the globe. The company is Korea’s largest (and Asia’s fourth largest) refiner with a refining capacity of 1.15 million barrels per day, as of 2006. SK Energy is engaged in exploration and development activities in 26 oil / gas blocks in 14 nations worldwide.[26][27]
SK Telecom (Korean: SK 텔레콤 or 에스케이 텔레콤, ) is a South Korean company specializing in offering mobile phone services, wired and wireless combined services. It is part of the SK Group and has evolved from a first-generation analog cellular system operator to become the company that launched the world's first commercial CDMA service. SK Telecom moved on to operate Korea's first 2.5-G CDMA 2000 1X system, followed by the world's first commercial 3-G synchronized cellular system. SK Telecom also launched the world's first 3.5-G HSDPA and HSUPA services.[citation needed]
SK E&C (Korean: SK 건설 or 에스케이 건설) is a Korean construction company founded and established in 1977 with a previous name of Sunkyung Construction (Korean: 선경 건설), headquartered in Gwanhun-dong Jongno-gu, Seoul. Its brands include SK View, SK Hub, and Apelbaum. The company's CEO is Casey Choi. Industries: Oil & Gas, Petrochemical, Power, Environmental Protection, Industrial, Civil, Building, Housing. Services:Feasibility Study, EPC Service, Project Management, Operations & Maintenance.
SK Corporation Holdings (Korean: SK 주식회사 홀딩스 or 에스케이 주식회사 홀딩스, ) is the holding company which resulted when SK Corporation was reorganized in July 1, 2007, into a holding company and operating company, SK Holdings and SK Energy, respectively. SK Holdings is a part of the SK Group that focuses on 3 core business interests, Energy & Chemicals, Telecommunications, and Trading & Services. The SK Group is composed of 88 affiliate companies that share the SK brand and culture. In 2006, SK Group recorded combined revenues of $75.8 billion, with exports contributing $26.4 billion of that total. SK continues to expand its global presence, with more than 25,000 employees who work from 113 offices worldwide.
SK Telink (Korean: SK 텔링크 or 에스케이 텔링크), a subsidiary of SK Telecom, was established in April 1998 as an international telephony service provider and has grown into a major player in the international calling market. Under the brand name 00700, the company provides international call services. Building on the commercial long-distance telephony and value-added services launched in 2005, the company began offering Korean SMS in June 2006 in the U.S. The service allows subscribers to send and receive Korean text messages in the U.S., as well as to and from Korea. From 2008 on, SK Telink also started e-Learning service (giving Lectures to customers through the internet) and Foreign Language Test service BULATS. BULATS is being used as the main English speaking test for most of the SK Group subsidiaries.
SK Planet (Korean: SK 플래닛 or 에스케이 플래닛) is a marketing and management company in the SK Group. The company mainly derived from the marketing teams of SK Energy and SK Telecom. It was established on April 4, 2008. The company accounts for several services which were previously provided by SK Energy and SK Telecom, such as the OK Cashbag from SK Energy and the Gifticon service from SK Telecom. They also hold a subsidiary "Ofelis", which is a wedding consulting company.
SK Corporation C&C (Korean: SK 주식회사 C&C or 에스케이 주식회사 씨앤씨) was established in 1991 and is currently one of the "Big Three" IT services companies in Korea. SK C&C has business interests across IT services, including telecommunications, banking & finance, government, public, logistics, and other fields. And the company is expanding its presence overseas. Industries in its product portfolio include GIS, ITS, ERP, national security & defense, postal, e-government, e-learning, postal, and other areas. They also specialize in mobile commerce products and SK C&C USA launched Google Wallet services recently.
SK Wyverns (Korean: SK 와이번스) is one of the top-ranking baseball teams in the Korea Baseball Organization.
Management system[edit]
SK's subsidiary companies all operate under the SK Management System (SKMS) which was developed, articulated and enhanced by SK’s Chairman, Chey Tae-won.
On April 7, 2008, SK Group launched a marketing and management company named "SK Marketing & Company" to pursue Chairman Chey's vision.
See also[edit]


Companies portal



chaebol
Economy of South Korea
List of Korea-related topics

References[edit]



^ http://www.koreatimes.co.kr/www/news/biz/2016/12/123_220610.html
^ a b c "SK그룹, 2000년 이후 재계 위상·실적·고용 모두 잡아=ceoscoredaily.com". Retrieved June 22, 2017. 
^ Fortune 500 2009 List of the World largest Companies
^ Ungson & Wong (2008). Global Strategic Management. M.E. Sharpe. 
^ Mee Kim, Eun (1999). Big Business--Strong State. SUNY Press. p. 91. ISBN 0-7914-3209-2. 
^ "Diversifying into the Global Marketplace". Korean Integrated News Database System. August 30, 2001. 
^ Chang, Se-jin (2003). Financial Crisis and Transformation of Korean Business Groups. Cambridge University Press. p. 70. ISBN 0-521-81435-9. 
^ SKtelecom.com
^ Kearney (Firm), Kearney, Inc, A. T (2000). Sustaining Corporate Growth: Harnessing Your Strategic Strengths. CRC Press. p. 75. ISBN 1-57444-289-9. 
^ "Sunkyong Sets Sails as SK Group Today". Archived from the original on March 11, 2008. Retrieved 2008-01-23. 
^ "Korea’s first locally developed drug gets KFDA approval". Korean Integrated News Database System. July 15, 1999. 
^ "SK gets nod to test Schizophrenia drug". Korean Integrated News Database System. September 7, 2003. 
^ "SK Corporation Announces Another IND, Schizophrenia Drug YKP1358". High Beam Research. October 8, 2003. 
^ "South Korea the World’s First 3G Network". 3GNewsroom.com. May 31, 2001. 
^ "SK Starts New Generation Mobile Phone Service". Korean Integrated News Database System. January 27, 2002. 
^ "Questions, Expectations over DMB Service". Korea.net. March 20, 2004. 
^ "SK Telecom Selects LGE, Nortel UMTS/HSDPA Wireless Broadband Technology". Retrieved 2008-01-23. 
^ "SK Energy Acquires Oil Production Rights in Brazil". Korea.net. July 30, 2007. 
^ "SK Corp. buys Inchon to raise oil exports". Retrieved 2008-01-23. 
^ "Uhde will build SKC HPPO unit". Korea.net. May 22, 2006. 
^ "SK Corp to split as adopts holding co. structure". Reuters. April 11, 2007. Retrieved 2008-01-23. 
^ "SK Launches Holding Company System". Archived from the original on 2007-09-30. Retrieved 2008-01-23. 
^ https://www.reuters.com/article/deals-day-idUSL4N1FN2KN Reuters Deals
^ "SK Innovation is doubling its battery production for electric vehicles to 4GWh/year to support demand from Mercedes and others". Electrek. 6 March 2017. Retrieved 6 March 2017. 
^ Jung-a, Song (April 2, 2017). "LG Chem holds faith in China despite battery of obstacles". Financial Times. Retrieved April 3, 2017. 
^ "China Aviation faces 3rd creditor lawsuit". International Herald Tribune. February 24, 2005. 
^ "New probe hits SK chief". BBC News. September 22, 2003. 



External links[edit]

SK site SK







v
t
e


SK



Subsidiaries





Energy & Chemicals




SK Innvotion
SK Energy
SK Global Chemical
SK Lubricants
SK Incheon Petrochem
SK Trading International
SK Chemicals
SKC
SK E&S
SK Gas
SK Biopharmaceuticals






Information, Telecommunication & Semiconductor




SK Telecom
SK C&C
SK Planet
SK Hynix
SK Broadband
SK Telesys
SK Telink
SK Communications

Nate








Marketing & Service




SK Networks
SK E&C
SK Shipping
SK Security











Sports



SK Wyverns
Jeju United
Seoul SK Knights
SK Telecom T1
SK Sugar Gliders
SK Hawks












v
t
e


Chaebol (South Korean conglomerates)




Economy of South Korea



Top 10



Samsung
Hyundai Motor Group
LG
SK Group
Lotte
GS Group
Hyundai Heavy Industries Group
Kumho Asiana Group
Hanjin
Hanwha





Others



Aju Group
Amorepacific Corporation
Byuck San
CJ Group
Crown
Daelim Group
Daesang Corporation
Dongbu Group
Dongkuk
Doosan Group
E-Land
Eugene Group
Halla Group
Hanil
Hankook Tire
Hansol
Hite
Hyosung
Isu Group
KCC Corporation
Kiswel Group
Kolon Group
Korea Tobacco & Ginseng Corporation
KT Corporation
Kyobo Life Insurance Company
LS Group
Nexen
Nongshim
Orion
POSCO
Saehan
Shinsegae
SsangYong Group
STX Corporation
Taekwang Group
YTN Group





Defunct



Daewoo
Keo-Pyung








 Category












v
t
e


S&P Asia 50 companies






AIA Group
BOC Hong Kong (Holdings)
Cathay Financial Holding
China Construction Bank
China Life Insurance
China Mobile
China Petroleum & Chemical
China Steel
Chunghwa Telecom
CK Hutchison Holdings
CLP Holdings
CNOOC Limited
CTBC Financial Holding
DBS Group
Delta Electronics
Formosa Chem & Fibre
Formosa Plastics
Fubon Financial Holding
Galaxy Entertainment Group
Hang Seng Bank
Hon Hai Precision Industry
Hong Kong and China Gas
Hong Kong Exchanges and Clearing
Hyundai Heavy Industries
Hyundai Mobis
Hyundai Motor
Industrial and Commercial Bank of China
Jardine Matheson
KB Financial Group
Keppel
Kia Motors
KT&G
LG Chem
Li & Fung
Lippo Group
MediaTek
Nan Ya Plastics
Oversea-Chinese Banking Corporation
PetroChina
Ping An Insurance
POSCO
Power Assets Holdings
Samsung Electronics
Sands China
Shinhan Financial Group
Singapore Telecommunications
Sun Hung Kai Properties
Taiwan Semiconductor Manufacturing
United Overseas Bank
Want Want China Holdings










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=SK_Group&oldid=789705241"					
Categories: SK Group1953 establishments in South KoreaChaebolConglomerate companies established in 1953Conglomerate companies of South KoreaElectric vehicle battery manufacturersManufacturing companies based in SeoulMultinational companies headquartered in South KoreaNon-renewable resource companies established in 1953Petrochemical companiesSouth Korean brandsTechnology companies of South KoreaHidden categories: Pages using deprecated image syntaxAll articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from February 2010 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


DanskDeutschEspañolفارسیFrançais한국어ItalianoMagyarМонгол日本語PortuguêsРусскийTürkçeTiếng Việt中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 9 July 2017, at 01:44.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 







































Thick Steel Plate, POSCO, MDS-Y30, SK NETWORKS CO.,LTD.























The global B2B marketplace to source Korean products
Bookmark BuyKOREA


Join Free
Sign in
my buyKOREA
FAQ
about buyKOREA









For Buyer
For Seller








All







Search


All
Product
Buying Offer
Image
Business Events
FAQ















KOREAN Products

All Products
Global Business Partnering
Global Procurement Challenge
Power-Tech Korea 2017
Korea Service Market 2017
Consumer Goods Showcase
CHINA HIGHWAY Products
Promising Products
EU KPP Products
Power products
ITS products
New Products
Creative Startup Products
[Team Korea] Products
World Champ Products


Buying Offer
KOPS Pay
EMS Shipment
Business Events
Video Meeting























Product Category


Automobiles & Vehicles 



													
												Automobiles 



													
												Auto Parts 



													
												Motorcycles, Bicycles & Parts 



													
												Railway Vehicles & Parts 



													
												Elevators & Escalators 



													
												Ships, Ocean Structures & Parts 



													
												Airplanes & Parts 



													
												Spaceships & Parts 




Electronic Components



													
												Semiconductors 



													
												Electron Tubes 



													
												Passive Components 



													
												Electro-Mechanical Components 



													
												Batteries 



													
												Flat-Panel Displays & Sensors 



													
												Other Electronic Components 




Chemicals & Pharmaceuticals 



													
												Basic Petrochemicals 



													
												Petrochemical Intermediate Materials 



													
												Materials for Synthetic Fiber 



													
												Synthetic Resin 



													
												Synthetic Rubber 



													
												Other Petrochemicals 



													
												Dyestuffs & Pigment 



													
												Paint, Varnish & Ink 



													
												Adhesives 



													
												Surfactants 



													
												Photographic/Cinematographic Materials 



													
												Agrochemicals & Phamaceuticals 



													
												Fine Chemical Materials 



													
												Other Fine Chemicals 



													
												Nitrogen Fertilizer 



													
												Phosphate Fertilizer 



													
												Potassium Fertilizer 



													
												Compound Fertilizer 



													
												Other Fertilizer 



													
												Other Chemical Industry Products 




Electronics, Computers & Telecommunication 



													
												Wired Communication Equipments 



													
												Wireless Communication Equipments 



													
												Computers 



													
												Industrial Electronics



													
												Measurement, Control & Analysis Instruments 



													
												Video Devices 



													
												Audio Devices 



													
												Refrigerators 



													
												Home Appliances 



													
												Electro-Thermal Appliances 



													
												Lighting 



													
												Electronic Watches/Clocks & Game Players 



													
												ICT Solutions



													
												Other Household Appliances 




Minerals, Glass & Ceramics 



													
												Gold, Silver & Platinum 



													
												Iron Ore 



													
												Copper Ore 



													
												Aluminum Ore 



													
												Tin Ore 



													
												Zinc Ore 



													
												Nickel Ore 



													
												Other Metal Ore



													
												Graphite 



													
												Salt



													
												Kaolin 



													
												Limestone 



													
												Other Non-Metallic Minerals 



													
												Crude Oil 



													
												Coal 



													
												Petroleum Products 



													
												Liquided Petroleum Gas 



													
												Uranium 



													
												Cement



													
												Tiles & Ceramics 



													
												Glassware



													
												Other Ceramics 



													
												Asbestos Products 



													
												Mica Products 



													
												Other Mineral Products 




Metals & Metal Products 



													
												Section Shape Steel 



													
												Wire Rod, Bar Steel & Reinforcement 



													
												Steel Sheet 



													
												Steel Pipes & Steel Wire 



													
												Rails & Steel Structures 



													
												Steel Containers & Chain 



													
												Cast & Forged 



													
												Ferroalloy, Pig Iron & Iron Scrap 



													
												Semi-Finished Steel Products & Other Steel Products 



													
												Aluminum Products 



													
												Copper Products 



													
												Nickel Products 



													
												Magnesium Products 



													
												Lead Products 



													
												Zinc Products 



													
												Tin Products 



													
												Tungsten,  Molybdenum & Manganese Products 



													
												Other Nonferrous Metal Products 



													
												Coins 



													
												Nails 



													
												Containers 



													
												Other Steel & Metal Products




Machinery 



													
												Engines, Turbines & Pumps 



													
												Conveyors & Load/Unload Machines 



													
												Air Conditioners & Coolers/Heaters 



													
												Office Machines 



													
												Optical Instruments 



													
												Textile Machinery & Chemical Instruments 



													
												Wood/Mineral/Glass Working Machinery 



													
												Metal Working Machinery 



													
												Food Processing/Packaging Machinery 



													
												Construction & Mining Machinery 



													
												Rolling Mills, Welding Machines & Casting Machinery 



													
												Paper-Making & Printing Machinery 



													
												Agricultural Machinery 



													
												Other Industrial Machines 



													
												Watches & Clocks 



													
												Semiconductor Manufacturing Equipments 



													
												Plotters 



													
												Surveying Instruments 



													
												Flat-Panel Display Manufacturing Equipments 



													
												Other Machinery 




Textiles & Leather Products 



													
												Leather



													
												Leather Products 



													
												Synthetic Fiber 



													
												Regenerated Fiber 



													
												Natural Fiber Yarn 



													
												Synthetic Filament Yarn 



													
												Synthetic Fiber Spun Yarn 



													
												Silk Fabric 



													
												Wool Fabric 



													
												Cotton Fabric 



													
												Synthetic Filament Fabric 



													
												Synthetic Staple Fiber Fabric 



													
												Knitted Fabric 



													
												Other Fabric 



													
												Garments & Clothes 



													
												Other Textile Products 



													
												Fur 




Rubber & Plastic



													
												Plastic Products 



													
												Rubber Products 




Electric Equipments 



													
												Generators & Motors 



													
												Static Electric Equipmemts 



													
												Renewable Energy



													
												Heavy Electric Equipments 



													
												Electric Wires 




Mechanical Parts & Tools 



													
												Friction Products 



													
												Grinding Products 



													
												Mechanical Elements 



													
												Tools 



													
												Dies 




Agriculture & Fishery



													
												Cereal & Fruit 



													
												Live Plants 



													
												Vegetable Matter 



													
												Vegetable Materials 



													
												Favorite Food 



													
												Processed Agricultural Products 



													
												Seeds 



													
												Other Agricultural/Farm Products 



													
												Live Animals 



													
												Meat 



													
												Animal By-Products 



													
												Processed Livestock Products 



													
												Animal Hair 



													
												Wood & Timber 



													
												Tree Seeds 



													
												Forest By-Products 



													
												Fish 



													
												Crustaceans 



													
												Mollusks 



													
												Seaweed 



													
												Fish Meat & Roe 



													
												Processed Fishery Products 



													
												Fishery By-Products 



													
												Other Fishery Products 




Pulp, Paper & Printing 



													
												Paper Materials 



													
												Paper Products 



													
												Books 



													
												Periodical Publications 



													
												Maps 



													
												Other Printouts 




Beauty & Living Ware



													
												Umbrellas & Parasols 



													
												Bags 



													
												Belts 



													
												Portable Accessories 



													
												Home/Living Ware



													
												Nail



													
												Cosmetics, Soap & Toothpaste 



													
												Flatware Sets 



													
												Jewels(Jewelry) 



													
												Beauty Accessories 



													
												Imitation Jewelry 



													
												Wigs & Fake Eyebrows 



													
												Other Personal Items 




Furniture



													
												Chairs



													
												Beds



													
												Tables



													
												Desks



													
												Wardrobes, Dressing Tables & Storage Drawers 



													
												Other Furniture




Sports, Hobbies & Toys 



													
												Footwear 



													
												Piano



													
												Strings



													
												Wind Instruments 



													
												Percussion Instruments 



													
												Musical Instrument Parts & Accessories 



													
												Other Musical Instruments 



													
												Sport Products 



													
												Hobbies & Entertainment 



													
												Dolls 



													
												Riding Toys 



													
												Self-Assembly Toys 



													
												Other Toys 




Eyewear



													
												Eyeglasses 



													
												Contact Lens 




Office & School Supplies



													
												Writing Supplies 



													
												Art & Drafting Supplies 



													
												Office Supplies 



													
												Other Office & School Supplies 




Gifts & Crafts



													
												Artificial Flowers 



													
												Shell Crafts 



													
												Glass Crafts 



													
												Other Crafts 



													
												Paintings 



													
												Sculptures 



													
												Stamps 



													
												Antiques 



													
												Other Gifts & Crafts 




Health & Medical



													
												Health & Medical Devices



													
												Health & Medical Supplies




Environment



													
												Recycling



													
												Water Treatment



													
												Waste Management



													
												Air quality Management



													
												Other environmental products




Others 



													
												Other Miscellaneous Products 



													
												Engineering, Procurement and Construction



													
												Services




SEE ALL CATEGORIES















Home > Product Detail



Metals & Metal Products 
				>
				
Section Shape Steel 
Wire Rod, Bar Steel & Reinforcement 
Steel Sheet 
Steel Pipes & Steel Wire 
Rails & Steel Structures 
Steel Containers & Chain 
Cast & Forged 
Ferroalloy, Pig Iron & Iron Scrap 
Semi-Finished Steel Products & Other Steel Products 
Aluminum Products 
Copper Products 
Nickel Products 
Magnesium Products 
Lead Products 
Zinc Products 
Tin Products 
Tungsten,  Molybdenum & Manganese Products 
Other Nonferrous Metal Products 
Coins 
Nails 
Containers 
Other Steel & Metal Products

				>
				
Medium/Thick Plates 
Hot Rolled Steel Sheets 
Cold Rolled Steel Sheets 
Galvanized Steel Sheets 
Electrical Steel Sheets 
Tin Plates 
Coated Steel Sheets 




Thick Steel Plate, POSCO, MDS-Y30(Pd No. : 3045522)
(Updated : 11/17/2015)
























product information






Model Nm



HS CODE
720851


M.O.Q



Ceritification




Keywords
POSCO, Thick Plate, Offshore steel, NORSOK, MDS-Y30


Seller ID
refactoring






Inquiry Now
Video Meeting











Product Description
Company Information
Related Business Event


SK Networks is a trading company mainly dealing with POSCO's thick plates for offshore/onshore EPC companies, shipbuilders and wind turbine construction company, etc.
 
Our current projects or reference experiences are as follows:
 
    - Statoil Johan Sverdrup PJT: providing NORSOK standard steel plates for jackets, T/S
    - Petrobras 8 FPSO PJT: providing steel plates for construction of FPSO
    - Providing many various thick plates to customers
 
 
 
 




Product Description
Company Information
Related Business Event




Company Information


company information








Contact Person
 


Company
 SK NETWORKS CO.,LTD.


Address
 


Homepage

www.sknetworks.co.kr
										
									
								
								
				  				
						  			, 
							  		
							  		http://seller.buykorea.org/sk-networks--1041627



Tel
 07078002702
Fax
 07078002702


Biz. Type
 Manufacturing and trade
Est. Year

								
								 
									-
								
								


Employees
 501~









View all products of this company




Product Description
Company Information
Related Business Event



Related Business Event List







Global Business Partnering Week 2015

2015-12-08 ~ 2015-12-08


Busan International Motor Show(BIMOS) 2016

2016-06-02 ~ 2016-06-03


Global Offshore & Marine Plaza 2015

2015-12-16 ~ 2015-12-16














Inquiry




- Please leave a detailed inquiry to get an accurate reply from the Korean seller.



Inquiry Sample




Inquiry






To
SK NETWORKS CO.,LTD.


CC

 You are able to send one CC-mail ONLY



Message





Price Quote









SEND
























What is buyKOREA?
buyKOREA Guide
Terms of Use
Privacy Policy


Copyright (c) 2004 all rights reserved, buyKOREA.org.
Global B2B e-marketplace, operated by KOTRA, enabling KOPS payment & EMS delivery.
KOTRA: (06792) 13, Heolleung-ro, Seocho-gu, Seoul, Korea (Tel. +82-1600-7119)





KOTRA Family Site
------------------------
KOTRA 홈페이지
KOTRA 해외시장뉴스
GEP
Invest Korea


















CUSTOMER CENTER


FAQ
Q&A






QUICK MENU

















 















 








Sk Networks Co.,Ltd. Company Profile | EMIS










 


















Close



Menu







Search




$0.00 (0)
Basket



Basket


 

 




 
 



Total


USD
$0.00


 

View basket
Checkout now
 

 






Industry Reports
Company Reports
M&A Reports



                                 
                            













 


 
 

















Home  Company reports search  Sk Networks Co.,Ltd.     







 


 South Korea                
Sk Networks Co.,Ltd.
An EMIS Company Report
EMIS is a Euromoney Institutional Investor plc company
USD 29.95

Industry: Securities, Commodity Contracts, and Other Financial Investments and Related Activities
Available in: English
Format: PDF Download
Most recent financial data: 2016

Buy full report
 
 
 
 




What’s included?
This report extracts all available information about this company from EMIS' database of company information. The Table of Contents on the right indicates the categories of information that will be included in your report upon purchase.
Download a sample report






 


Company Tear Sheet                    
                        (locked content will be provided in the purchased report)
                    


Contact Information                    





Headquarters
                                795, Gyeongsu-daero Jangan-gu Suwon-si Gyeonggi                                
                                Suwon;                                Gyeonggi;                                Map 
                                                                    Postal Code: 440816                                                            

Tel: 070-7800-
Fax: 02-2221-




Website:
http://www.sknetworks.co.kr 



 

Company Description                    




                        SK Networks Co., Ltd. engages in Trading and investment, ICT Device distribution, Petroleum, Automotive services, fashion, Consumer goods and hotel services. The company operates SK gas stations and OK Mart convenience stores. SK Networks distributes apparels such as Tommy Hilfiger, DKNY, CK Calvin Klein among others. The company's headquarters is located in Seoul, South Korea with offices located in markets including USA, Japan, Indonesia, China, taiwan, Kazakhstan, Malaysia, UAE, Saudi Arabia, Iran, Mexico, Canada, Australia, England, Turkey, Czech, Germany, India, Vietnam, Singapore, Netherlands and Spain. SK Networks Co., Ltd. was incorporated in 1956 formerly known as SK Global Company Ltd.                    


NAICS Industry Classification                    


Basic Information                    


Key Executives                    


Ownership Details                    


Key Financial Highlights                    


Financial Performance Charts                    


Top Competitors                    

 

Financial Statements

Annual Statements                    


Ratios                    

 







 
 





What this report allows you to do
EMIS company reports provide the data you need to make accurate assessments about businesses you are interested in.




Identify sales opportunities

Does the company match your target demographic?
Who are the key executives?




Conduct risk assessment

Is the company creditworthy?
Is it financially stable?




Carry out strategic research

Is the company a potential business partner/investment opportunity?
What is its financial performance?


 
 
 
 


You’re in good company
EMIS company reports are used extensively by the world’s biggest companies, financial institutions, professional service companies and universities to assess businesses in emerging markets. 







800,000+
company profiles
We have information on both public and private companies across 125 countries.


2,000+
clients
EMIS is the go-to information source on emerging market companies for the world’s most prestigious businesses.

 
 
 
 

 









Enterprise ACCESS
If you need regular and ongoing access to company information, you should consider a subscription to the full EMIS service.
EMIS company profiles are part of a larger information service where that combines company, industry and country data and analysis for over 125 emerging markets on a unique information platform.
REQUEST A DEMO




 


Contact us to learn more about our business solutions.
 
 





FOLLOW US

B



 
 



Sign up to our newsletter
Make sure you’re not the last to know by getting the latest insights on emerging markets straight to your inbox.


Sign up

 
 


 
 
 















 


































Speedmate MF Battery, SK NETWORKS CO.,LTD.























The global B2B marketplace to source Korean products
Bookmark BuyKOREA


Join Free
Sign in
my buyKOREA
FAQ
about buyKOREA









For Buyer
For Seller








All







Search


All
Product
Buying Offer
Image
Business Events
FAQ















KOREAN Products

All Products
Global Business Partnering
Global Procurement Challenge
Power-Tech Korea 2017
Korea Service Market 2017
Consumer Goods Showcase
CHINA HIGHWAY Products
Promising Products
EU KPP Products
Power products
ITS products
New Products
Creative Startup Products
[Team Korea] Products
World Champ Products


Buying Offer
KOPS Pay
EMS Shipment
Business Events
Video Meeting























Product Category


Automobiles & Vehicles 



													
												Automobiles 



													
												Auto Parts 



													
												Motorcycles, Bicycles & Parts 



													
												Railway Vehicles & Parts 



													
												Elevators & Escalators 



													
												Ships, Ocean Structures & Parts 



													
												Airplanes & Parts 



													
												Spaceships & Parts 




Electronic Components



													
												Semiconductors 



													
												Electron Tubes 



													
												Passive Components 



													
												Electro-Mechanical Components 



													
												Batteries 



													
												Flat-Panel Displays & Sensors 



													
												Other Electronic Components 




Chemicals & Pharmaceuticals 



													
												Basic Petrochemicals 



													
												Petrochemical Intermediate Materials 



													
												Materials for Synthetic Fiber 



													
												Synthetic Resin 



													
												Synthetic Rubber 



													
												Other Petrochemicals 



													
												Dyestuffs & Pigment 



													
												Paint, Varnish & Ink 



													
												Adhesives 



													
												Surfactants 



													
												Photographic/Cinematographic Materials 



													
												Agrochemicals & Phamaceuticals 



													
												Fine Chemical Materials 



													
												Other Fine Chemicals 



													
												Nitrogen Fertilizer 



													
												Phosphate Fertilizer 



													
												Potassium Fertilizer 



													
												Compound Fertilizer 



													
												Other Fertilizer 



													
												Other Chemical Industry Products 




Electronics, Computers & Telecommunication 



													
												Wired Communication Equipments 



													
												Wireless Communication Equipments 



													
												Computers 



													
												Industrial Electronics



													
												Measurement, Control & Analysis Instruments 



													
												Video Devices 



													
												Audio Devices 



													
												Refrigerators 



													
												Home Appliances 



													
												Electro-Thermal Appliances 



													
												Lighting 



													
												Electronic Watches/Clocks & Game Players 



													
												ICT Solutions



													
												Other Household Appliances 




Minerals, Glass & Ceramics 



													
												Gold, Silver & Platinum 



													
												Iron Ore 



													
												Copper Ore 



													
												Aluminum Ore 



													
												Tin Ore 



													
												Zinc Ore 



													
												Nickel Ore 



													
												Other Metal Ore



													
												Graphite 



													
												Salt



													
												Kaolin 



													
												Limestone 



													
												Other Non-Metallic Minerals 



													
												Crude Oil 



													
												Coal 



													
												Petroleum Products 



													
												Liquided Petroleum Gas 



													
												Uranium 



													
												Cement



													
												Tiles & Ceramics 



													
												Glassware



													
												Other Ceramics 



													
												Asbestos Products 



													
												Mica Products 



													
												Other Mineral Products 




Metals & Metal Products 



													
												Section Shape Steel 



													
												Wire Rod, Bar Steel & Reinforcement 



													
												Steel Sheet 



													
												Steel Pipes & Steel Wire 



													
												Rails & Steel Structures 



													
												Steel Containers & Chain 



													
												Cast & Forged 



													
												Ferroalloy, Pig Iron & Iron Scrap 



													
												Semi-Finished Steel Products & Other Steel Products 



													
												Aluminum Products 



													
												Copper Products 



													
												Nickel Products 



													
												Magnesium Products 



													
												Lead Products 



													
												Zinc Products 



													
												Tin Products 



													
												Tungsten,  Molybdenum & Manganese Products 



													
												Other Nonferrous Metal Products 



													
												Coins 



													
												Nails 



													
												Containers 



													
												Other Steel & Metal Products




Machinery 



													
												Engines, Turbines & Pumps 



													
												Conveyors & Load/Unload Machines 



													
												Air Conditioners & Coolers/Heaters 



													
												Office Machines 



													
												Optical Instruments 



													
												Textile Machinery & Chemical Instruments 



													
												Wood/Mineral/Glass Working Machinery 



													
												Metal Working Machinery 



													
												Food Processing/Packaging Machinery 



													
												Construction & Mining Machinery 



													
												Rolling Mills, Welding Machines & Casting Machinery 



													
												Paper-Making & Printing Machinery 



													
												Agricultural Machinery 



													
												Other Industrial Machines 



													
												Watches & Clocks 



													
												Semiconductor Manufacturing Equipments 



													
												Plotters 



													
												Surveying Instruments 



													
												Flat-Panel Display Manufacturing Equipments 



													
												Other Machinery 




Textiles & Leather Products 



													
												Leather



													
												Leather Products 



													
												Synthetic Fiber 



													
												Regenerated Fiber 



													
												Natural Fiber Yarn 



													
												Synthetic Filament Yarn 



													
												Synthetic Fiber Spun Yarn 



													
												Silk Fabric 



													
												Wool Fabric 



													
												Cotton Fabric 



													
												Synthetic Filament Fabric 



													
												Synthetic Staple Fiber Fabric 



													
												Knitted Fabric 



													
												Other Fabric 



													
												Garments & Clothes 



													
												Other Textile Products 



													
												Fur 




Rubber & Plastic



													
												Plastic Products 



													
												Rubber Products 




Electric Equipments 



													
												Generators & Motors 



													
												Static Electric Equipmemts 



													
												Renewable Energy



													
												Heavy Electric Equipments 



													
												Electric Wires 




Mechanical Parts & Tools 



													
												Friction Products 



													
												Grinding Products 



													
												Mechanical Elements 



													
												Tools 



													
												Dies 




Agriculture & Fishery



													
												Cereal & Fruit 



													
												Live Plants 



													
												Vegetable Matter 



													
												Vegetable Materials 



													
												Favorite Food 



													
												Processed Agricultural Products 



													
												Seeds 



													
												Other Agricultural/Farm Products 



													
												Live Animals 



													
												Meat 



													
												Animal By-Products 



													
												Processed Livestock Products 



													
												Animal Hair 



													
												Wood & Timber 



													
												Tree Seeds 



													
												Forest By-Products 



													
												Fish 



													
												Crustaceans 



													
												Mollusks 



													
												Seaweed 



													
												Fish Meat & Roe 



													
												Processed Fishery Products 



													
												Fishery By-Products 



													
												Other Fishery Products 




Pulp, Paper & Printing 



													
												Paper Materials 



													
												Paper Products 



													
												Books 



													
												Periodical Publications 



													
												Maps 



													
												Other Printouts 




Beauty & Living Ware



													
												Umbrellas & Parasols 



													
												Bags 



													
												Belts 



													
												Portable Accessories 



													
												Home/Living Ware



													
												Nail



													
												Cosmetics, Soap & Toothpaste 



													
												Flatware Sets 



													
												Jewels(Jewelry) 



													
												Beauty Accessories 



													
												Imitation Jewelry 



													
												Wigs & Fake Eyebrows 



													
												Other Personal Items 




Furniture



													
												Chairs



													
												Beds



													
												Tables



													
												Desks



													
												Wardrobes, Dressing Tables & Storage Drawers 



													
												Other Furniture




Sports, Hobbies & Toys 



													
												Footwear 



													
												Piano



													
												Strings



													
												Wind Instruments 



													
												Percussion Instruments 



													
												Musical Instrument Parts & Accessories 



													
												Other Musical Instruments 



													
												Sport Products 



													
												Hobbies & Entertainment 



													
												Dolls 



													
												Riding Toys 



													
												Self-Assembly Toys 



													
												Other Toys 




Eyewear



													
												Eyeglasses 



													
												Contact Lens 




Office & School Supplies



													
												Writing Supplies 



													
												Art & Drafting Supplies 



													
												Office Supplies 



													
												Other Office & School Supplies 




Gifts & Crafts



													
												Artificial Flowers 



													
												Shell Crafts 



													
												Glass Crafts 



													
												Other Crafts 



													
												Paintings 



													
												Sculptures 



													
												Stamps 



													
												Antiques 



													
												Other Gifts & Crafts 




Health & Medical



													
												Health & Medical Devices



													
												Health & Medical Supplies




Environment



													
												Recycling



													
												Water Treatment



													
												Waste Management



													
												Air quality Management



													
												Other environmental products




Others 



													
												Other Miscellaneous Products 



													
												Engineering, Procurement and Construction



													
												Services




SEE ALL CATEGORIES















Home > Product Detail



Electronic Components
				>
				
Semiconductors 
Electron Tubes 
Passive Components 
Electro-Mechanical Components 
Batteries 
Flat-Panel Displays & Sensors 
Other Electronic Components 

				>
				
Dry Batteries/Cells 
Storage Batteries 
Spent Dry Batteries/Cells 




Speedmate MF Battery(Pd No. : 3038008)
(Updated : 08/23/2016)
























product information






Model Nm
Speedmate battery


HS CODE
850710


M.O.Q
10 Pallet/Pallets


Ceritification




Keywords
Mf battery, battery, speedmate, automotive battery


Seller ID
speedmate






Inquiry Now
Video Meeting











Product Description
Company Information
Related Business Event


Speedmate is No.1 AM brand in Korea.
All products are 100% made in Korea and our factory suppliers to vehicle manufacturers and Global AM manufacturers.
Our products are used by 750 Speedmate workshops in Korea, and more than 6 million Korean customers experience Speedmate products&Services a year.
Based on our success through huge networks, we have been succeeded in the international market as well.
 
Speedmate Battery
 
- Manufacturer : Global Top factory(Delkor)
- Quality level : OEM
- Coverage : 100% all vehicles (including all Japanese cars)
* Best-selling product under Speedmate brand
 
We are looking for long-term business partners in the world.
If you interested in Speedmate battery, Please contact me.
 
Web :  Http://parts.speedmate.com
Email : sangbin.parc@sk.com

Detail

- Min.Order Q'ty:10 Pallet/Pallets
- Supply Ability:70000 Piece/Pieces per Month
- Port:BUSAN PORT, SOUTH KOREA

- Payment Terms:L/C,T/T- Voltage: 12V

- Size: Various sizes


- Place of Origin: South Korea


- Range: 35~220 AH

- Packaging Details: Manufactured by Delkor
- Delivery Detail: 4weeks




Product Description
Company Information
Related Business Event




Company Information


company information








Contact Person
 


Company
 SK NETWORKS CO.,LTD.


Address
 


Homepage

www.sknetworks.co.kr
										
									
								
								
				  				
						  			, 
							  		
							  		http://seller.buykorea.org/sk-networks--1041627



Tel
 07078002702
Fax
 07078002702


Biz. Type
 Manufacturing and trade
Est. Year

								
								 
									-
								
								


Employees
 501~









View all products of this company




Other Products from [ speedmate ] (8)
View all















									
										
										
											Speedmate Wiper Blade
										
									
								















									
										
										
											Speedmate Shock Absorber
										
									
								















									
										
										
											Speedmate Water Pump
										
									
								















									
										
										
											Speedmate Ignition Wire Set
										
									
								















									
										
										
											Speedmate Hub bearing
										
									
								















									
										
											Speedmate brake pads, shoes,...
										
										
									
								















									
										
										
											Speedmate Clutch Kit
										
									
								















									
										
										
											Speedmate Filters
										
									
								









Product Description
Company Information
Related Business Event



Related Business Event List







Global Business Partnering Week 2015

2015-12-08 ~ 2015-12-08


Busan International Motor Show(BIMOS) 2016

2016-06-02 ~ 2016-06-03


KOAA SHOW

2015-10-20 ~ 2015-10-22


Latin Business Week 1:1 Meeting
KINTEX Exhibition Center II, Hall 6B
2017-05-17 ~ 2017-05-17














Inquiry




- Please leave a detailed inquiry to get an accurate reply from the Korean seller.



Inquiry Sample




Inquiry






To
SK NETWORKS CO.,LTD.


CC

 You are able to send one CC-mail ONLY



Message





Price Quote









SEND
























What is buyKOREA?
buyKOREA Guide
Terms of Use
Privacy Policy


Copyright (c) 2004 all rights reserved, buyKOREA.org.
Global B2B e-marketplace, operated by KOTRA, enabling KOPS payment & EMS delivery.
KOTRA: (06792) 13, Heolleung-ro, Seocho-gu, Seoul, Korea (Tel. +82-1600-7119)





KOTRA Family Site
------------------------
KOTRA 홈페이지
KOTRA 해외시장뉴스
GEP
Invest Korea


















CUSTOMER CENTER


FAQ
Q&A






QUICK MENU

















 















 




























Sk Networks Co., Ltd., Jung-gu, Daegu, South Korea | Supplier Report — Panjiva





 













磐聚网

菜单 





磐聚网


解决方案

采购商
供应商
物流公司
政府机关
数据分析



产品

台
企业版
定制服务



数据

美国贸易数据
墨西哥贸易数据
巴西贸易数据
中 & 南美洲数据
中国贸易数据
趋势分析工具
磐聚网调研


价格详情
搜索

中文


English 

Español 







 在线演示 申请在线演示 

+86-21-6196-2555


登录 











Sk Networks Co., Ltd.
磐聚网制作的企业页面 
 企业页面  供应商公司  South Korea







 查看 Sk Networks Co., Ltd.公司的产品和客户 
成千上万家像您这样的公司使用磐聚网搜索供应商和竞争对手。


Request a Demo

        1 min video
      






轻松使用贸易数据


578美国进口货运

96 南美货运信息 

43 墨西哥货运信息 

 

以公司为组织的美国海关记录
578适用于美国的出货量Sk Networks Co., Ltd.自2007年起每周更新一次




日期
供应商
客户
详细信息

          41          more fields
        


2017-07-30

查看全部 578 货运记录 Sk Networks Co., Ltd. 选择磐聚网数据套餐方案.申请演示或注册
 

2017-07-30


2017-07-30
Sk Networks Co., Ltd.
Skc Inc.
52 COILS ELECTROLYTIC TIN PLATE STEEL SHEET
货运提单


货运数据显示一个公司交易什么产品或者更多。
      了解更多信息 



简洁并有序的南美国家货运信息。
96可查看的南美货运记录Sk Networks Co., Ltd.




日期
数据来源
客户
详细信息


2016-07-11

See all 96 south american shipments for Sk Networks Co., Ltd. with Panjiva's South America data add-on.Request a DemoorSign Up
 

2016-08-13


2016-12-02
Colombia Imports
INDUSTRIAS HACEB S A
CODIGO UAP: 255 DO: M0148613MDE-BUN  PEDIDO NRO 4500051020 DECLARACION 1 DE 1  NRO. FACTUR



货运数据显示一个公司交易的产品及更多信息了解更多




简洁有序的墨西哥货运信息。
43 可使用的墨西哥货运信息 Sk Networks Co., Ltd.




日期
数据来源
客户
详细信息


2013-07-25

查看全部43 墨西哥货运信息Sk Networks Co., Ltd. 使用磐聚网的墨西哥附加数据。申请在线演示或注册
 

2013-09-04


2015-12-02
Mexico Imports
OPTIMO AUTOPARTES S.A. DE C.V.
BOLIGRAFOS, GUANTES 100% ALGODON TEJIDO DE PUNTO, KIT DE EMBRAGUE, POSTER



货运数据显示一个公司交易的产品及更多信息了解更多




快速地分析贸易关系




采购业务链
探索隐藏在美国进口数据的贸易关系。
See all 68 的客户 Sk Networks Co., Ltd.
 详细了解采购业务链 




最大的客户


Skc Inc. 






注册并访问 







注册并访问 







注册并访问 







注册并访问 






 68 可联系的客户 


顶级产品


钢 





不锈钢 





stainless steel welded 





stainless steel welded tube 





steel welded tube 





 20出口最多的产品 






联系信息Sk Networks Co., Ltd.



 
 地址71-9, Samseong-Dong 
 


www.sknetworks.co.kr/ 
 




           
      更多的联系方式 



Sample Bill of Lading

717 shipment records available



Date
2017-07-30


Shipper Name
Sk Networks


Shipper Address
199-15 EULCHIRO-2GA, JUNG-GU, SEOUL, KOREA, SEOUL   KRKR


Consignee Name
Skc Inc.


Consignee Address
17785 CENTER COURT DR. SUITE 375, CERRITOS, CA 90703, 562-207-1185, CERRITOS             CA90703     US


Notify Party Name
Skc Inc.


Notify Party Address
17785 CENTER COURT DR. SUITE 375, CERRITOS, CA 90703, 562-207-1185, CERRITOS             CA90703US


Weight
205170


Weight Unit
K


Weight in KG
205170.0


Quantity
32


Quantity Unit
COL


Country of Origin
South Korea


Details
205,170.0 kgFrom port: Pohang, South KoreaTo port: Georgia Ports Authority, Savannah, Georgia


Place of Receipt
Pohang, Kr


Foreign Port of Lading
Pohang, South Korea


U.S. Port of Unlading
Georgia Ports Authority, Savannah, Georgia


U.S. Destination Port
Georgia Ports Authority, Savannah, Georgia


Commodity
32 COILS ELECTROLYTIC TIN PLATE STEEL SHEET


Container
NC


Marks Description
32 COILS ELECTROLYTIC TIN PLATE STEEL SHEET


Carrier Name
SK SHIPPING CO LTD


Vessel Name
AN DING HAI


Voyage Number
733E


Bill of Lading Number
SKSMPHSV73300200


Lloyd's Code
9751303







 


同类产品的供应商South Korea 

South Korean stainless manufacturers
South Korean stainless steel manufacturers
South Korean stainless steel welded tube manufacturers
South Korean steel manufacturers
South Korean steel welded manufacturers
South Korean tube manufacturers
South Korean welded tube manufacturers.
            


供应商类似Sk Networks Co., Ltd. 

Solvay Specialty Polymers Korea
Lg Innotek Co., Ltd.
Knkw Co., Ltd.
Texshion Textile Co., Ltd.
C And R Cosmetic Co., Ltd.
Mastercon Line Co., Ltd.
Dns Korea Co., Ltd..
              






成千上万的公司使用磐聚网研究供应商和竞争对手

申请在线演示











解决方案
采购商
供应商
物流公司
政府机关
数据分析




产品
台
企业版
定制服务




数据
美国
墨西哥
巴西
中、南美州
中国
磐聚网调研
合作伙伴




公司名
领导团队
董事会
博客
媒体评论
联系方式
职位



                20 West 22nd Street, Suite 706New York, NY, 10010 / USA上海市徐汇区肇嘉浜路1065号1609D单元                ‌
Request a demo











English 

Español 

中文







使用条款
隐私条款
网站地图





2017年©Panjiva公司







Cart (0) 
Continue Browsing

 






 











SK





































본문 바로가기
하위메뉴 바로가기





















Main menu

About SK 
Press Center
Careers
Happiness

SK Holdings


search




















                                    About SK




                                        Overview

                                        Affiliates

                                        Financials

                                        Global SK


                                        CI

                                        SKMS

                                         History






                                    Channel



SK News
TV Ads
Newsletter






                                    Careers



Recruitment
Policy
Compensation
Openings






                                    Happiness



Overview
Social Enterprise
Group Program
Affiliates
SK Foundation
Participation






                                    Corporation




Holding Company


Investor Relations










                                Energy/Chemicals


SK innovation
SK energy
SK global chemical
SK lubricants
SK incheon petrochem
SK trading international
SK chemicals
SKC
SK E&S
SK gas




Information/Telecommunication/Semiconductor


SK telecom
SK C&C
SK planet
SK hynix
SK broadband
SK telesys
SK telink
SK communications




Marketing & Service


SK networks
SK E&C
SK shipping
SK securities










Main Content



MAIN


ㆍAbout SK
ㆍPress Center
ㆍCareers
ㆍContribution
ㆍSK Holdings


ㆍAbout SK
ㆍPress Center
ㆍCareers
ㆍContribution
ㆍSK Holdings


 

To be of help to Korea steadily OK! SK!





stop slideshow
play slideshow





















About SK





Global SK



Happiness
















SK innovation
                                                                            


















































Envergy/Chemicals
SK innovation
                                                                                            
SK energy
                                                                                            
SK global chemical
                                                                                            
SK lubricants
                                                                                            
SK chemicals
                                                                                            
SKC
                                                                                            
SK E&S
                                                                                            
SK gas
                                                                                            

Information/Telecommunication
SK telecom
                                                                                            

SK planet
                                                                                            
SK hynix
                                                                                            
SK broadband
                                                                                            
SK telesys
                                                                                            
SK telink
                                                                                            
SK communications
                                                                                            

Marketing & Service
SK networks
                                                                                            
SK E&C
                                                                                            
SK shipping
                                                                                            
SK security
                                                                                            










Investor Relations


Financial Information
providing information for efficient investment.









SKMS
SKMS is a unique management system of SK which established in 1979 through agreement of all the members' of SK group.









SK Newsletter






Global SK
SK is always challenging by your side to bring happiness for everyone in the world.











Global SK
SK is always challenging by your side to bring happiness for everyone in the world.


SKMS







Happiness

                                SK is endeavoring to create durable happiness. SK believes that the warm hearts and sharing, even though it is small, consist of happy Korea.
                                


Ethical Management

SK staff members practice ethical management.
View Code of Ethics  > 






TV Ads
We'll make it : OK! SK! 




                           
More than simply expanding the company in the energy, chemistry, information, and communication industries, SK challenges to impact the world by focusing on the little things.






Careers
SK is waiting for application of people with passion.

There are so many men of telant in SK that SK could be called as the forest of men of talent,which has to do with the management philosophy of the SK founder, president, Chey, Jong Hyeon.





News



[SK telecom]
07/24/2017
SK Telecom to Accelerate Popularization of  Quantum Cryptogr ...




[SK holdings]
07/18/2017
Chairman Chey Tae-won Received ‘James A. Van Fleet Award’ ...




[SK holdings]
07/10/2017
Chairman Chey Tae-won Re-operating Global Partnering for Coo ...




[SK holdings]
06/29/2017
SK and US Companies Will Develop Resources in the US and Exp ...




[SK telecom]
06/29/2017
SK Telecom Honored with Two Awards at  Asia Mobile Awards 20 ...








Affiliates
SK makes an effort to develop new growth drives
We are leading the era of ubiquitous and convergence through continuous technology innovation.








Sharing happiness
SK is endeavoring to create durable happiness. SK believes that the warm hearts and sharing, even though it is small, consist of happy Korea. 


Ethical Management Report

SK staff members are practicing ethical management.
View Code of Ethics  > 







Sharing happiness
SK is endeavoring to create durable happiness. SK believes that the warm hearts and sharing, even though it is small, consist of happy Korea.


Ethical Management

SK staff members are practicing ethical management.
more info >>
                                                                            






SKMS





















